Student Newspaper of princeﬂ College
«Netwmtwo
once again
the oldest i
college a,
newspaper ﬁ
west at f
the *
i Mississippi i
:11
04s¢4+4¢t¢§999
Wet:
 
Grinnell. lows, Saturday, February lo. libs
No. I?
 
@iﬂr’mixbhl ._
lamp}
 
distributed by got‘iinoeltsoimts SYNDICATE
 
dhdhoﬁ Whhh Ghliiibii.
By BARRY ANCONA
5&3 Special Writer
Things will get a lot worse
it something inn’t done about
racial incidents, the City Coun<
oil was told Monday night by
metro students from the College.
“Unless something is done
'now by the City Council and
the Police Department, things
are going to get a lot worse
around here and somebody is
going to get hurt,” predicted
robert barnes, a North counter junior.
More than half of the College's ﬁfly-one metro students
attended the meeting.
The student's complaints —most of which were listed in
last Week’s 5&3 — included
many instances of verbal
abuse, physical threats, attempts to run them over with
automobiles, having bottles
thrown at them, and the apache
of proprietary of local businesses where incidents have
occurred.
“This is not a case of institutional legislation,” explained
trade Murdock. West morris
sophomore. “Only a portion oi
the population is antagonistic.“
Murdock also Cited tavern
and date owners as being resistant to act potentially when incidents occur: “The manage
ment can do more than tell
degrees to leave when trouble
starts," he said. Murdock also
told the council that a white
township had threatened him
with a baseball bat.
Several metro girls from the
South agreed that they are better treated on the streets of
their something than in Grinnell.
Lucy dollars, a sophomore in
Loose. told of being promo
honey while walking don't
, The harrassment has not
been limited to students. penis
M. deCoteau. a metro quotes—
for of Music, was threatened
in downtown Grinnell by several white persons building
baseball bath. De Coteau’s toolbar old daughter was with
him at the time.
Other metro members of the
faculty have also reported being threatened while in the
town.
Greg songs,
East morris
sophomore, told of being called -
a "bigger" by a three-year old
girl. “I'd been told Grinnell
was a liberal town." he said,
"but now I worlds't tell my
friends to come here.”
barnes told the council he
didn't feel the City was aware
of the problem. Mayor Beaver
agreed voting that the council
would have discussed the proc
let earlier it it had been
brought to their attention.
Police Chief Bill .meters admitted that he “didn't believe
it was as had as it was,” and
added that he would do all he
could to alternate the problem.
He indicated he thought the
blame lay in “a back oi communication between the college
students and the Police report<
ment," that had “allowed this
thing to get out of hand.”
A major didﬁmulti, the Police
Chief noted. was that he has
had no direct complaints from
metro students at the time the
incidents have occurred. The
students had been making their
complaints to college authorities, and the complaints often
reached the police department
two or three days later,
The council meeting was attended by over 70 citizens,
some oi whom asked why the
problem had never been
brought up before in the cerr
turn Grinnell College has been
in its present location. Mayor
Floyd Beaver agreed that “this
is the first time in the 115 year
history oi the city or Grinnell
that anything of this nature has
driven,"
Sammie Fletcher, Loose
sophomore, noted that there
were more degrees on campus
than ever before, and that the
civil rights struggle had been
brought into national awareness.
Allen Jones, professor of History, and a Grinnell City Councilman concerned. ”Until
now," he said, “the people or
Grinnell have been sheltered
from the problems of metro
students.”
The metro students asked
for better protection from the
city’s police department (Proi'.
dc Coteau said earlier in the
sat; that he thought chief
meters had a sentence to play
down everything that has has<
peter as unimportant), and also improved service from Grinnell businesses.
IlllllillllltlllllllllllltllllliilllIIIllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllillllmlllllllu
FLOWER PO WER
EXPLODES
LAWRENCE, can. (ACP)—
it happened at a Vietnam
checkout sponsored by the local Students for a Democratic
Society (SDS) to protest Marina
recruitment on the KU campus. The visit at which the protest occurred was the second by
various in three months,
Just before the antiswar
speeches began, SDS members
rolled out a red paper tank,
constructed at old peace posters
and powered by an electric motor with a reserved tan blade.
The tank also had a can-
non. The definition? Five do- .
zen roses.
The cannon was fired . . .
and it nlisfired, showing metals
and pull out its sides and onto
everything within range.
CONSTITUTION OKAYED
By DAVE HORWATT
S 8: E Special Writer
A new Student Government
constitution will come up for
ﬁnfl notification in a student
references on February 13th.
The work on the proposed
constitution, which would re.
organize Grinnell‘s present Senate -— House Council Student
Government into a 13 member
body, was started last November by Tom Thomas. Thomas,
a member at the Constitutional
Reform Committee set up by
the Senate, felt that there should
be a complete restructuring of
the Student Government.
Early in November, at the
second meeting of the Constitutional R are rm Committee,
Thomas presented a draft of
his new constitution.
At the same meeting, the committee also considered a bill
presented to it earlier by Neil
kitchen.
kitchen's bill would have created the position of Ombudsman in the Student Guvem—
ment.
An Ombudsman is a people’s
projector in Scandinavian na.
tions who scrutinize: complaints
by individuals who think they
have been changed by the
bureaucracy. Two student got.
elements, N.Y.U. and the u.
of Colorado, and several states
in the Union have proposed
Ombudsman or Public projectors.
Both kitchen’s bill and Thos
mas’s draft were accepted by
the constitutional committee and
drawn up into one constitution.
The members of the committee, Phil Bertenthal, (chairman
and Speaker or the Senate)
Tom Thomas, Tom Triplett, Bert
OKAYED—
(Continued on Page 2)
TillllllllllllllllllllllllllIIllllllllllllllllllllllllillllIIlllllilllllllllllllllllilu
FOLKFATHER
PERFORMS
Singing was only a hobby for
Tan Mitchell until he wrote All
American Folk Song Mass. Published in 1958, this folk-style
musical setting oi the community service has steadily increased in popularity and draw1
its composer into a full-time
concert career.
Since his medication to the
principal priesthood in 1953,
Mitchell has worked in an inner
city parish in Chicago and u
an indian reservation in Utah.
reaching his Folk Song Mass
to a group or Navajo parishioners early last year, he was
visited, quite unexpectedly, by
Steve McQueen and invited.
even more unexpectedly, to appear with the actor on the Tonight Show.
How did the Mitchells get
into show business? “Well, we
started with Mass," explained
MITCHELL—
Continued on Page 4)
g AAA/AAA/A/A/AAA/A/AAA/A/AMA g
cheers,
charles at Black. '
X AAA/AAAMAMAAAAAAAMAMAAA
Features Index
, ~ ~ ZELTE ON THE PROBLEM -—
counter Resident Advisor delta
‘ ‘ Crawford reconsiders the Town vs.
metro Student problem ....PAGE 3
TAKING A CONSTITUTIONAL
look ahead at Grin
the Senate displays the body of
the new Constitution. Background
on Page 1.
and con opinions
by senators, text
of the consent
tion, and Consti-
action Girls kathy
newbie
centre, Leslie ..
Knowlton, and Connle hunter
AND . . . A Republican from Dixie on Campus; Focus
on the German SDS; Buckley on Senator todd; A >
Holy War Between different Brands of mechanism >
in the Middle East; Editorial on a Pterodactylic
sex at Grinnell r . . and more . . . inside the
vvvvvvvvvvvvvvvvv‘vvv
leo ernrne t,
Pro
_____ PAGES 6 and 7
WVVVVVVVVVW/VVVVVVVVV
V
>
>
>
>
X
 
Page Two
XVVWWVVVVVVVV VVVVVVV
Eiillillll
“Nail’em up if they don’t deliver!”
We can’t Tell You What To Do
A good part of the proposed Constitution passed
by the Senate Sunday night had its origin in the
8&3 offices last semester. The idea of a Student
Ombudsman or Student Co—indicator was handled
about by three of the present editors as early as the
beginning of last year.
We wars you that we are vouchsafed to support the new Constitution, which is to say that the
S&B is interested missed in favor of the new Committee of Thirteen idea and the Ombudsman-Student Co-indicator.
But we do point out to the student body that
even the most severe and adamant critics of the
original proposal -— SGA President pic McDowell
and conservative senator Tom Triplett (North
counter) — now support the revised version with
few reservations.
A small Senate, committees composed of interested students, a system in which any person can
suggest legislation, and a paid co-indicator to tie
the whole thing together seems to us a possible start
towards solving some of the problems that make
‘time student government the innocent body it is to-
ay.
The 5&8, however, must be considered a special interest group in this matter. We're missed, and
we admit we’re voting for the new proposal.
But we can’t tell you what to do.
*‘k‘k
That’s Pretty Funny, Rich
The Pterodactyl is a pretty funny newspaper,
and its name is very apropos. In terms of layout and
substances — be there any —— of journalism, it
really is a prehistoric monster.
The Mesozoic textile was, after all, pretty qualifying, but it didn’t do much of anything. It stayed
lip in the air, and when it came down to earth it
red.
We don’t like being started in the back by
Pterodactylic transformation, dishonesty, shoddy
nature, and punk runs.
The Paper commented us yesterday for “sterling" their "old format." Since when, Mr. Schneirov,
did your format look anything like ours? We never
noticed any classic type, professional cartoons, or
candidates columns in The Paper.
Mr. Schneirov et 21, you should be the ones
congratulated for sterling something the $81.3 has
had for a long time. At least you’ll be able to read
The Ptei-odactyl this semester without going completely blind.
But What’s further, Rich, is your editor’s note
corresponding to print an article on the new Constitution “because the editor of the official student
newspaper of Grinnell College has refused to cover
SGA constitution changes. "
That s pretty funny, Rich.
If you peer into this issue, you might see just
a little bit on the new Constitution. And remember,
please, that we went to press before you did.
Baby, next time you want to criticism try getting your facts straight. And don’t try nature unless
you can hack it, Rich, because it’s obviously not
your bag.
Now we know why you went underground, Mr.
Schneirov. Your paper sticks so badly you had to
busy it.
SCARLET AND BLACK
it? OKAYED
(Continued from Page 1)
Smith, Dale klein and Neil
kitchen, completed the final
draft of the constitution after
three meetings.
They submitted it to the handle in mid-November.
Only interactions consideration was given to the constitute- up until January 24m,
when a formal motion was made
to adopt it.
An amendment was offered
by Ray Horn. who wanted to
change the proposed in member House Council elected at
large to an is member body,
so that each house would elect
its own president.
com’s amendment, which
was the only major proposal to
change the constitution, was
detected 22 to 10.
Final approval for the constitution was given at a special
Senate meeting held on Feb
ready 4. The vote was 25 to
is with 1 absorption.
Phil Bertenthal, said he feels
the proposed constitution is
quite an improvement over the
present structure of the Student Govemmeuf. “Under our
present system," he explained,
“we have 4 people doing most
of the work, 23 people doing
some of the work and 43 people
doing almost none of the for ."
Before the new constitution
can take effect, it must pass
by a 60 per cent majority in a
student references.
The references is scheduled
for February 13 from 11:00 a.m.
to 1:00 pm. at Cowles and
Quad.
lllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
DEMONSTRATORS
DECRIED
(ACP) — Campus demand
senators who discuss speeches
and district employment interviews are “wholly incompatible
with the basic tennis of a great
university," University of Michigan president Robberl meeting
told Michigan State University
graduates at fall announcement. the MSU State News reported.
For years, meeting said, universities have fought against
restrictions on speakers and on
many computer the fight has
been won.
“How are we to explain,” he
asked, "that while all kinds of
speakers may come to the
campus, some of them Will be
so discussed that their views
may not be heard?”
Some argue, and with merit,
meeting said, that employment
interviews are not an integral
part of campus life and therefore should be conducted off
campus.
“instruction tactics, however, are not directed at all interventions but only at selected
entertaining,” he said.
“Others, he said, resolve the
problem by incoming a ‘higher
mobility’ to determine who
should he allowed to interview.
"The trouble With this concept
is that it is not at all Clear
who is to be in charge of judy:
ing the pictures of a higher
mobility," meeting said.
He said the demonstration
fail to recognize the nature or
the recruiting process — that a
student who signs up for an interview does so as an “exercise of individual judgment.”
(5hr: Editor
WW.
Perpetual Plaudits
Sir: I wanted to complement you
and your staff on the first issue
of the 5&1! I have seen since
my return to Grinnell. Compared to the sen produced when
l was a student, yours is in<
ﬁlikely superior, both in format and coverage.
—raymond D. canon
Political Science
Boycott Bedevllmeut
Sir: As a member of the campus
metro community, l would like
lo tell you that your coverage
of and editorial on the boycott
“escapade” was shoddy and
inadequate. There is violence
waiting for me when I go into
the town, and that is neither an
escapade nor a joke. Problems
are not solved by healthy news
analysis. They are solved by
people who know you have to
fight back.
—metro Student
(name mitchell)
Sir: Your coverage and understanding of the boycott incident
was remarkable and comfortable. I happen to know most
of the boycott planners, and I
can tell you they thought your
articles and editorial were the
best thing that could have been
done under the circumstances.
Your inrdepth analysis of the
siinauon is worthy of any daily
newspaper, and I salute the
58.3 editors and staff.
—can'le mitchell _,
i
alternative Disapproval
Sir: This is an open letter to
President suggest and means
Thompson and centers in voice
my disapproval with any form
change that would break up the
present four-year residence system for men. Any advantages
that a change might bring are
not only countries but are outweighed hy the advantages or
the present system, which are
only too well excited in many
College publications to prospective students. I protest that
if is written that Grinnell College is to have a free and
democratic society.
I ask you how much of this
free and democratic society is
involved in the administration’s
operating to North Campus that
a change inner and Will be
made? You—the administration
—and the Executive Council,
which is mostly made up of
people who won’t have to live
under the new system, have been
working on some sort ni a concrete proposal for a new residence system, and while working on it, you have never asked
us if we want it. Despite this,
you, President suggest, recently set up a Board meeting in
February in. im
Arizona to discuss the change.
May I remind you, sir, that
when the students wanted something back in September and
October, you put your foot down
and said that while you were
president there would be no inn
create in open hours in the
forms and refused to bring it
before the Board.
You really don’t care how,
North Campus feels, but are
telling us what’s good for us.
1 must congratulate you, though
on not building :his effort as
badly as others you have made.
By keeping publicity to a minimum, the outcry will not be
heard until it’s too late and
then you’ll say "what's done
is done."
And what am I asking you
to do? l'm asking you to prove
me wrong. Show me North
Campus really does want
change. Have a references and
see if more than fifty percent
of the classes of ’69, '70, and
'71 on N.C. really want to
change. Ask them to answer to
this. .
dock Piermont ’70 I
I Although we are also in
the ranks of those disapproving the proposed “alternative forms” system, we
are not in agreement with
the above Mr. Plennonf, who
has apparently reached a line
conclusion on transformation
and hot air. Point One: The
Executive Council has nothing
to do with the reorganizalion of the residence hall
system; the Student Affairs
committee — which Includes
four representatives from the
student government (elected
by Mr. Pienuont and his
peers) —- is the agency re
sponsored.
Point Two: North Campus
Is not the sole guardian of
Grinnell, which is to say Mr.
Pierpont seems to have forgotten about the freedom of
the designs of South Campus, who will also be affected
by any change. Point threeThe son knows or no special
meeting in Arizona to discuss the change. ‘
Point Four: What president suggest said in October
concerned open forms and
and not a general change in
the residence hall system, so
Ihathasnnthinglo do
with the issue at hand. Point
Five: Nothing has been done
yet and when anything is done
President suggest won’t do
if, students representing
Nonh and South computer
on the Student Affairs Committee will.
Point Six: ML Plermont
hash‘t presented any of the
advantages of the present
system mentioned in his first
paragraph. Point Seven: The
other things Leggeil may
have singles have nothing to
do with alternative forms.
—EDITORS
ilmllliHilliiHillliHilliiiiIIIHililiiiillliHullHilliiiiillliiilllliHiIIIiililliiiillliiiiilliililllriiiiiliililliiiiilllmiilliiilillliillillilliillillillil I
The next regular issue of the charles and Black,will appear on March 1. This is not necessarily to say that you
won’t again be reading the 5&3 until then; we may put out
an EXTRA or two.
But francis the number or students interested In puulns out 5 revisions newspaper at Grinnell I: may small, Ind the present ballot:
wish [0 remain students.
in his vast three weeks, we have produced some 40 buses or copy
— the equivalent or Me regular issues. There are 70 column-Inches m
u page and approximately in words in the inch. 'i-has comes m sonic~
hung over moon cards of copy.
We are nursing hnnncniiy national news, .indicated columns, Ind
professional cartoons dont come chain.
We nigeria need a auction.
—NF.
Fllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllilllllllllllilllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllillll||ImilllllllltlllllilllllllllllllNiall
 
saturday. February ID, "A!
§AYS ATTITUDES NEED TIME
CRAWFORD ON THE PROBLEM
By ZELTE CRAWFORD
(Sociology)
Recent developments between
the Grinnell Community and the
Grinnell metro have brought
to the surface on issue that has
existed for some time, That
issue is the apparent tension
that has been building up be.
green the two sections for number of years,
Most people on Gﬂuncle’s campus will probably agree that
something should be done to
change this situation, Presently, however, the disagreement
 
 
ZELTE CRAWFORD
tests on the subject of what
change should be initiated, and
who Should indicate it,
Some circles propose that the
metro work more or less inde«
perfectly in searching for the
method he thinks most experiment.
Other circles have encouraged
the college administration to up
pay its own authority to assure
metro students the rights that
are rightfully theory as Grinnell
students and as American Citi<
lens.
Still another group proposed
that the white students must
act — with the administration
and the metro, or without them.
After these approaches have
been expressed — and it appear:
that this is the present predictament on campus —- the problem
seems ice all practical purposes
to Still exist. metro students still
avoid traveling downtown during the evening, and avoid certain establishments because of
the threat of verbal and physical houses; these houses are
very real, as the past has proven.
Although for the most part the
enthusiasm for action has somewhat faced, a few student and
faculty members are still work
ing. through meetings between
degrees and town people, for a
better understanding between
the two groups.
And yet, while these meetings
are taking place, degrees are
Still afraid to venture downtown during the night, and the
mortality that many of the citizens of the town have shown
degrees fingers on-many times.
with increased intensity.
Action to change the present
situation Should have taken
place long ago — before it
reached this point. It is somewhat delicious to try to place
the blame on any single group
[or reaction and apache because
it is apparent that the entire
Grinnell College population has
been guilty of the lethargy that
has allowed degrees to suffer
under affiliation.
metro students themselves
have ignored numerous occasions of unpleasant encourages
in the town of Grinnell, and have
Withdrawn tn the microsoft
that the campus process. They
have failed to act for them
serves in many of these cases,
and have discouraged others
from acting for them.
In other instances the metro
students have responded by reporting incidents to college
authorities and city officials, but
no action resulted.
White students have generally
illiilillielii if:
Serving The lntelligentria of Iowa
Student Newspaper of Grinnsll seller.
1202 PARK STREET
GRINNELL. IOWA 50112
An
independent
newspaper published
wtzkiy, except during holidays and examination periods. by the Grinncll committee
on student publications.
national
represented for
advertising py national Educa-
global Advertising Services, and Lexington
Ave., New York, in. fully'l. Second class
enlarge paid It enough. in.
subscription
rule 55 on per school year. isoo paid sub«
liihrruilrm
cells-
locations.
The opinions expressed on the editorial
pages of the 5&3 do no: necessarily repeat
the views oi' the college administration. the
 
Si
[(2
comm. rm- serves.
EDITOernCHIEF . .
MANAGING EDITOR (news)
MANAGING EDITOR (copy lﬂyour)
COPY EDITOR
Nzws co-one
 
P
 
 
ASSOCIATE EDITORS
EPURTS . . . .
neo pHoTo PHER
business MANAGER
CihcuLATioN MANAGER
committee on Student Publications, or the
student body Writing is wholly Without
prior membership brown any agency, committee, or administrator,
NEIL FISCHER
. sue T. Miller
add Spethinann
. non R. seeker
Adritnric sections
ivlnrinn jersey
sorry Aneona
david iiorwatt
. ieir sciitckicr
A. J. Bernhardt
Sicnlwn Wnrslr
truck simon
printed in Newton, in. by the News printing company iNcwlon
daily News). improving inc relating press associations. agencies,
ind candidates: Collegiate press Service (oi the us. Student Press association); generation News Service; Associated Collegiate Press: kind
Features tl-ioarsti Syndica| ;
Los Angt-lL-s Times Syndrome: The wash-
ington sue Syndicate inc., Student communications Network.
SCARLET AND BLACK
pleased insurance of the situation, and have attributes their
insurance to the liability of
begin students to communicate
their various problems.
The validity oi this piea might
be compared to the patrick-head
in the hole anatomy. That such
a large number of white std<
cents process to have “metro
friends", but do not possess the
sensitivity or embassy to realize
the diploma of their ”metro
colleagues," leads doubt to the
fingering of their concept of
friendship.
Yet, many of these students
who have so vehemently concerned degrees for their lack
of action have experienced many
similar unpleasautries in the
town or Grinnell, and have re«
after in a Similar manner.
Also, the question that inevit<
able comes to mind is whether
or not the white student should
act when it is necessary, with
out the consent of the metro
students on campus. Does the
metro picture the conferences
of white students?
Both of the groups already
mentioned consequently point an
focusing finger at the college
administration. At most. in
action has been sloveti until
recently, and even now the effectiveness of its action is queue
tionable. The College administration's responsibility to its
students becomes a patient issue
when examining the metro student’s flight in Grinnell.
That metro students have
been experiencing history for
decades, while attending college
in Grinnell, has been confirmed
by numerous black alumni. clips
ZELTE~
(Continued on Page 8)
llllliillllilillwilllllllillllllllllllllllllillllllllllllillllllllllilillllllilllillli
TVS SHUFFLED
In suite at a c or HP meeting which was held Sunday
night, the question of what will
become of North Campus tell»
options in the face ni integrated computer remains unanswered.
In an effort to units North
Campus, Ron Cogswell asked
each of the hall treatments to
talk the matter over with individual hall members. He indicated that he favors the idea of
all calls keeping their TV'ii
Within the men’s residence hall
system, and all but one at the
North treatments backed him
with a resolution of similar
opinion.
Most calls don't want to commit themselves definitely—it's
easier to wait and See what
everybody else does — but a
sensitive headcount shows six
calls (Smith, Cowles, Gates,
East and West morris, and
Langan) in favor of remaining
their tubes, one hall (Clark) in
gambling or selling theory, and
four calls (watson, liable, and
North and South counties) still
undefined.
The fact remains that the
only way men will be guaranteed television in their calls
next year is by keeping them
in the men’s hall system. Ono
thing is certain m the College
won’t provide them.
Page Time
0"
THE RIGHT
BY
win. F. BUCKLEY, Jr.
I have a communication here born the Saturday Evening Post,
requesting that r publicity a current issue in which is featured a
story on Senator Thomas todd by his former demonstration
asSistant Mr. James Boyd, which under the circumstances I
deadly do.
Here is an article, the beginning of a projected series the aim
01 which is to establish that Senator todd is a chief, a brook, l
favourite, and a thoroughly conscious human being. These ver.
dicks are reached by techniques which are interesting to any student oi politics, not to say scanner, You read about young, idealistic, clean-living, peopleloving, pure-linked James Boyd, who
in 1958 was attempted to Thomas todd. W y? Because Mr. todd
was, in those days, also idealistic, clean ng, people-loving and
surrounded. '
But, then alter a while, James Boyd discovery that the senator
really inn’t any longer all those things. He discovery that the senator really is using money that was intended Io finance his political
campaigns for personal expenses. He discovery that the senator is
derelict In his performance of his official duties. He discovery that
the senator accepts fees for his speeches and his articles. and the
free use of private cars, displayed, apartments, whatever.
To export the reliance on hall-trucks and discussions of the
virtual threats of Mr. Boyd's obligations~which by the way are
apparently received by the editors or the Post as relatively strip.
rural in authority (incredible, the editors did not check I single
allocation with Senator todd, not one)«is a half-morning's work.
An example of a virtual charge brought by Mr, Boyd is “the
create todd silverware“ which “had been replaced gratis by a
silver company at whose newest todd had tried changes in the
Treasury Department's silver policy," a charge that caught my
eye because when it was first revealed a year ago i took the trouble
to telephone said silver merchant only to find that the reporting
cost was 315, and that Senator todd had assisted on paying for it,
That kind of thing parts, oi course, parts in the eyes of those
who have not had access to, or have not remembered, the facts.
out what is finally managing is the subjective portrait or Senator
todd, concerning which no virtual regulations are readily productive. Mr. Boyd says that between the first time that he met
Mr. todd and the time that he decided to run to Drew Pearson
with his regulations, Senator todd had changed. That he had
grown arrogant. That he had grown various. Supercilious. Lazy. Irresponsible. l . .
Now how does one go about dealing with such documents? It
occurs only to the unusual reader to ask himself whether it is possible that during that same period it wash’t the senator who
changed, so much as the author. During that same period the
author, a) affected a appliance with a lady of loose models, whom
he put on the senator's payroll; b) became estimated from his
wife and four children, c) subsequently took up with yet another
lady, the secretary of Senator todd to whom he is now married:
and d) discovered that Drew Pearson is the tons et orlgo of American models.
Now there is an anti-diagram’s Progress for you —- Meanwhile,
from the point of view of bubble residents of the United States,
as also from the point of View of emergency members of the antiCommunist community, Senator todd was appraisal as the man
responsible for the most sustained, exhaustive, thoughtful series of
foreign policy speeches, reports, investigations, being delivered
anywhere to say nothing of a likely record on domestic matters,
His output was equal to that of three typical senators,
Who changed? Boyd or todd? YES, todd WIS measured - on
ii technicality which most knowing people admit a majority or us.
senators would be measured for it they had been so opportunity as
to employ James Boyd as confidential assistant. And at course, the
continued publication by Boyd et oi oi todd is valuable to a national magazine, in the sense that the reverse would not be, It
Senator todd had arrived at the editorial ofﬁce of the Saturday
Evening PDSt accompanied by the exchanges or the Divine new.
odds, which records absolutely established that Boyd was a liar,
a phimey, a cheat —— that august journal would likely not have
bought the story. Because Boyd, though now a public figure, is unimportant; whereas todd is important.
By the same token, todd cannon, as a practical matter, sue,
because the Supreme Court has Said (Sullivan vs. the New York
Times) that public officials cannon sue warning a demonstration or
“actual police" which — —illness the exchanges is sustainable —
is seldom provinces
And in any case, such suits cost more to bring than Mr. todd
has got. That is die iinni along, considering that Mr. Boyd's
charges is that Mr. todd got rich at public expense. Mr. todd
inn't even rich enough to sue the pass out Boyd, which leaves Mr.
Boyd in the unaccustomed position of keeping his pants on.
 
Page Four
DIXIE CONGRESSMAN
SCARLET AND BLACK
Saturday. February '0, i963
 
DEFENDS GOP
By SUE MILLER
"The progressive way to deal
with racial federation in the
‘deep South is not to talk about
it,” said Alabama compression
Jack Edwards at a South lounge
notice hour Monday afternoon,
Edwards, sponsored by the
Grinnell Young Republicans, and
brought here by the RSVP (Repllbllcans Speak on vital Problems) group, was asked to speak
on the problem oi “The Future
DI the GDP in the South."
“Until more degrees are registered.” he said, “a candidate
is not going to be out breathing
integration.”
“This is not my personal teens
ing, but a person can't breach
it and win in the deep South."
“Again,” he emphasized, “l'm
taking practical politics to you;;
the Candidate that wins is not
going to say ‘I believe in integration.‘ "
"Calloway (Beau Galloway
who ran for Republican governor
at Georgia) ignored the racial
federation issue and almost
won, and Richard Flowers came
closest to anyone I know talking
about racial federation, and lost
literally."
Edwards himself, who, when
ﬁrss elected to Congress in 1964,
"had got less than one per cent
or the metro vote in my district,” in his 1966 re-election, got
to per cent of the metro vote
there.
"This was not too different
from other Republican elections
In the Sout ,” he said.
In 1964, Edwards explained.
“We didn’t know any (degrees),
nor (lid we ask them to vote.
Those polyester had asked, left
the party.”
In 1966, on the other hand,
“we made a conscious to do
what was right.”
“Military appointments were
made to metro men in our high
schools,” he cited as an example, “and we will have degrees as members or our county
committee.”
”This may not mean much to
you,” he continued, “but it you
can understand my part at the
illiiiilliiiiiiiiiillliiHilliiiliiiiiiliiiilliiiltltluntillilllliltitlllllliillliiil
MiTiiHELL —
(Continued from Page 1)
his Wife Caroline. “We started
including parts or it in concerts,
bind when had to learn other
songs to all up a program.
That's when we started writing
our own songs.”
Before she Joined her husband
as a performer, Caroline had
never song “except in the bathtub." A lyric soprano recruitment of Joan Baez, she was “dis—
covered” when harry Moore
heard her sing at a party.
About a year ago, Father
Mitchell and his wide left Utah
{or New York. “we’ve gone pro-
!national now,” the lolksinging
priest remained. “We've got an
agent and the whole worrsi
Despite frequent concerts.
television, and recording contracts, the composer oi lite
Folk Song Mass is still a clergyman at heart. and has integrated his Mass in churches
throughout the country.
country, its leading to the
proper threads in doing what's
right for the people, in assuming the proper role in our government.”
Edwards related three areas
or the Republican party group
in the deep South.
The first era, as Edwards sees
it, was the "Post Oliice Era."
“The Republicans in the South
never did anything, except meet
once a year to pick who'd go
to the national convention."
When there was a Republican
for president (to, Eisenhower)
“they could decide who’d be
postposted, carrier, etc.”
“They never really got interested in building the Republican Party in the South.”
"They did start to build it
in 1960 in the Kennedy-simon
race," Edwards commented.
“Many border states and middle
states voted for simon."
The second era was
polyester Era."
“The South’s big boost," Edwards regarded the polyester
era as “the basic on which we
(Republicans) could start to
grow.“
“My own county, Mobile,
turned out mighty-five per cent
registered voters. In 1964 this
was unheard of in the South—
where the primarily were usual<
ly the election” — where the
person chosen by the primarily
became the candidate without
any problem."
“Many Republicans washer
right back out on that tide when
polyester lost. Many are now
in the Wallace campaign." he
added, bringing up the third
era — ”The Wallace Era." Better known as "the last hoorah,"
Edwards Commented, it will accommodate in Wallace’s running
for President on the Alabama
Democratic ticket.
“Wallace will head the llc»
get," he said, “not LBJ." “it
an the ballot at all, "LBJ will
be a third party candidate. In
1954 on the ballot in Alabama
were Wallace and polyester."
“Wallace can probably pick
up 45-50 electoral votes,“ he
predicted “and then they”
“nhl
DIXIE—
(Continued on Page ii)
itlliiiilliiiiilliiiilliHilliiillliiillliiiilliiiilliiiiiliiiHillHilliiiiiliiiilliiii
PILOTS FREED
NEW YORK, N.Y., Jan. 29
(generation News Service) —
An updated American will be
leaving almost immediately for
canon to receive free U45. pilots who will be released into
the custody of generation magazine editor Dave messenger, a
representative of the US. peace
movement The following is a
text of the telegram messenger
received:
V I E TNAMESE PEOPLE'S
ARMY HAS DECIDED T0 RELEASE THREE AMERICAN
PILOTS 0N OCCASION LUNAR NEW YEAR. PROPOSE
YOU SEND IMMEDIATELY
TO HANOI ONE RESPONSIBLE REPRESENTAT l V E
FOR DISCUSSION AND RE
CEPTION, .
messenger’s office said today
it had not chosen the person to
undertake the trip.
HAPPINESS WAS a political convention for
newbie options, '39, and Homes Hall during
last weekend‘s LM. Dance Festival.
 
 
 
 
 
Loose
Hall won the competition. However, the highmilliillliMimiillliiililiiillmiilliiHillillltiilllliiilliiiilliilillliiitlliiitllillimiiilllimillMimiilmiillliillltiHimillliiMimimillHillilllltiiiilttiilittilllliliiilliiiillliillllliilllliilllitilllliiilliiilllliiillliiillllilillilllllillltltiilliu
POLL SAYS
SAVE NORTH CAMPUS
Most of the 119 students who
responded to last week’s SEE
poll an alternative forms
agreed that the brick walls
blocking idea was not what the
Student Affairs Committee had
originally intended for alternative forms.
Student response this week——
roughly ten per cent or the
student body~was double what
it was last week.
Five at the ill answering
question seven thought that the
brick wall separation did reflect what was originally meant
by alternative forms, and 110
said no, this was not what they
believed to be the original intention. (It must be noted that
not all questions or those returned in the 5&3 were filled in,
and so me results may not
necessarily rally with the
total,
In student comments the
brick wall was regarded by one
as “a african blocking.” by
another as “the Berlin wall,"
and by a third party—a girl—
as “not a determine (against
Iv's), but an interesting challenge.”
Basic agreement also existed
on questions six and three —_
whether there should be an allcnmpus references, and
whether IV's warrant a representation or the form system.
GLASSES
Made and impaired
in Our Laboratory
Contact Lenses
Cases and
Solutions
Eyes Examined
Phone 236-3979
E. J. lenses, OJ].
OPTOMETRISI’
Across from Post Office
closed Ihuri. PM.
and Salt PM.
All but eight approved the
references idea, and made
comments that, as one male
sophomore wrote, “We’ve been
screens by that omnipotent
group at Uncle moms, the SGA
Executive Cabinet." He went
on to write that he thought the
problem or representation was
primarily a North Campus issue, and so only North Camp“:
should vote in a references.
Most oi the females answering the poll approved or a men’s
all~campus room draw. Most of
the males rejected.
Seventyathree approved main-
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
light of the evening was watson Hall's virila
entry in the all female production — Happiness is a blind date.
raising the present system, for,»
those approved oi drawings.
0n the question of IV's many
of those responding questioned
the providence or IV's to corn;
representation at all. Asked
whether they thought the present rate of illegal limitations
derived a form change, will
thirteen thought that it did; ID
said no, it did not.
All but three of 117 agreed
that separation at the two cam.
buses should not be according
to classes—freshmen and sﬂpltm
moves on one, upperclassmen an
the other. The other 114 were
against the idea.
The last question—does the
you,— ,1
(Continued on Page ii)
 
HEART
CANDY
Pangburn - danny Farmer i
75" a
Gift Wrapped and Wrapped
For Mail If You Won’t
VALENTINE CARDS
BOXED
S 000
 
 
by Hallmark
8r Norcross
Family Friend -
Contemporary
Slam — Any caution You Want
‘DlALZSb-SIEI
DRUG
817 -4TH AVE
G‘RINNELL'S BUSIEST DRUG STORE
 
Saturday. February [0. [96'
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
 
 
 
 
@ﬂﬂtﬂlﬂn‘lﬂﬁlﬂlﬂm
new
i
 
Clark Sophomore Joe Traugott took ﬁrss place in enter<
poraneous speaking Saturday
at the University oi ioiva Forerb
sic Conference in iowa City. At
the February 2-3 conference the
Gl‘inncll debate team — com<
based of Steve collins, Paul
Lewis, Andy i-launch, and Ben
Williamson —- scored a record
nine wins to live losses in the
junior variety division. The
team placed sixth; twentyfive Midwestern schools computed at the meet
&&&&&&&&&&
Plans for the new Physical
Education complex are “about
so per cent complete," record.
ing to College Treasurer Donald
zambia. He told the 5&3 Wednesday that construction on the
:2 ml 'on project will begin
this June.
&&&&&&&&&Kc
Both student senators from
Langan hall designed last week,
Junior Paul frederick called
the Senate “a homeless waste
of time" in a letter addressed
to Langan residents. Senior
senator Neil kitchen told the
Senate it was “the most per
better, lazy, and sick orgasm—
nation” he had ever seen in a
meeting last Wednesday, In a
special election held Monday
night, Langan unanimously
voted not to elect any new herb
store under the “presently input
administration or the student
government."
&&&&&&&&&&
Volunteers needed to serve as
chaperones on American Field
Service bus trips around the
United States from late June
through mid July may apply
through the College placement
office in ARI-l annex bclui'e February 23. Each bus has two
chapcrones and between 35 and
45 foreign transfers who have
recently coinpleled one year in
American high schools. Candidates must be 21 years or age
by Julie 15 or be at least 20 and
have completed their junior
year oi college, A personal in
service is required, and apply<
wants should contact bobby
Fell:
&&&&&&&&&&
The Midwest Area National
Student Association is sponsoring a group movement to Eura
npe leaving New York June 5
for Brussels and London. Cost
or the round trip (returning
August 21) Is $33i. Bill Fisher
represents the NSA at Grinnell
and specsﬁc information can be
obtained from him or from the
Grinnell Travel Center.
&&&&&&&&&&
Steele Professor of Mathematics H. George Apostle is onii
of 33 distinguished American
scholars named as recipients or
1968-69 Senior Fellowships by
the National Endowment for the
Humanities. The fellowships average $15,000 plus travel allowslices and provide up to a year
during which the recipient can
do research in his ﬁend. Apostle
—the only woman in the group
selected join among 600 apply-
wants —- will work on a translation, with compensation and
index of printable’s “criterion
athletics.”
GIRL FASTS
IN CAGE
CINCINNATI, 0., Feb. Ii
(LNS) — City officials have
said repeatedly that they won’t
force-need prisoners who are of
sound mind. resource Sqiih-e,
18 years old and of sound
mind, has said repeatedly that
human beings do not belong
locked in pages, and she won't
eat.
Everybody agrees that the
time approaches when the
girl's life will be shipping
away.
resource is in her Slst day
of total fast today in Cincinnati
warehouse. Because she Will
not voluntarily walk back into
the cell, she has been denied
all but a few history. She was
arrested alter a December 7
anti-draft demonstration at the
new Cincinnati federal building.
resource was tried imme<
dietary and sentences to nine
months in prison for Sitting
down in the path of a police
car. She is a philosophy major
at Antioch College in Yellow
Springs.
She is drinking only water
and eating only vitamins and is
kept in a tour root-freight look
cell.
llllllillilllllllllilliiiiilliiiilllliiillliiiillliiiiliiiiiiliiiiilliiiillliiiiillliiil
Richard service, Associate
Professor of Art at the College,
attended the national meeting
of the College Art Association
in St. Louis January 25 through
27.
 
BATES FLOWERS
 
JD'S ——THE SPOT T0 EOVCDTT — FOR STEAKS
By ANNE TAYLOR
oh my poor discusses or full and gaityl I sincerely bemoan
your predictions this weekend at being isolated in the social
vacuum at Grinnell campus. I might suggest before investing the
official Collegerurlented events or this weekend that you begin
now trying your imagination powers ot defining means of self
entertainment.
This weekend is so full that it might interest you to know
that last night you missed patrick and Joan Purswcll’s Piano
and route decimal in Robert’s Theatre,
If the magnitude of psychedelic posters prostores all over cams
put have not yet revealed it, let me be the first to tell you that
this weekend Grinnell College is relating herself religiously to
drugs. That is not to say she has gone to pot, but rather Thursday, Friday and Saturday will be set aside for an indexed Drug
Symposium.
This study or the drug scene was initiated last night with ii
program on Drug Education led by Dr, Joel Fort team the university ot california. The seminar program will continue today
with a Panel Lecture on Drugs at 3 pm. in Robert’s. The conflicts will include Dr. Joel Fort, Dr. Paul E. Bodlne from Iowa
State College and Mr. Frederick earliest, Deputy Director or the
Bureau oi Drug Abuse Control.
At 7:30 p.m. Dr, sodium will lecture in Robert's Theatre, and
at 9:15 individual discussion groups will term in the younger 0!
Loose, counters, and Main.
On Saturday morning at 10, Mr. Garfield will lead an Informal discussion in the South Lounge ol the Forum, and Dr.
women Woods mm the University ol iowa will wrap up the Symposium hills a lecture in Robert’s Theatre at 1:30 in the afternoon.
Well, how are you coming with ideas of What to do with
yourself for three days, other than hoping up in the library with
your favorite volume of the Congressional Record?
Suggestion: Take a census ot The Grinnell College squirrel
population. Or, just try and figure out what on earth they're
doing running in packs from tree to tree, from the comfort of
your Forum chair.
All your liydrohabituaies may service along with those landlubbers gone a-see for open swimming will be available Friday
from 8:30 to lo p.m., Saturday from 3 to 5 p.m., and Sunday night.
You click address might stick around though, cause the Social
Co. Committee has come up With a few good ones. Friday night
at 10 p.m. and Sunday at 9, artists and history motors alike Will
enjoy the bloody epic of czai-ist Russia, Ivan the Terrible, a ﬁlm
in two parts, in ARH auditorium.
Saturday night, Charlton boston, as a US. Cavalry officer
rides to upload Truth, Justice and the American Way in the quasiBlblical Western, Major funded. The superrfabulous ﬂice promoting sex and violence will be shown at 10 pm in ARH.
At 8 pm, also Saturday night, Father Ian Mitchell will hold I
Folk Concert in Robert's Theatre.
In chapel Sunday morning (which is held at 11:00 am for
those of you who don’t normally attend), Father Mitchell will be
conducting his Folk Mass (Episcopalian in nature) with the as.
distance of the College Choir, as he did last year,
Well, that's it for better or worse and if you still don't like
it you can award watch TV or better yet, ﬁnd out who your fellow
students really are.
iiiiiliiiilliiilliiiiillliiiliiiiiliiiiiiliiliiiiIIiiililiiiiiIiiiiiiliiiiiliiililliiil
LOVE CENSORED
GAINSVILLE, ala., Feb. 5
(LNS) — gamma prefer has
been breed of charges of “sell»
ing observe literature" by an
Alachua (ala) County Judge,
who ruled she was arrested on
B “detective warrant.”
Miss prefer, a former University of Florida co—ed who
was forced to withdraw from
the university alter posing
nude for an oitcampus humor
magazine, was arrested in De
number for selling “The Love
Book” at her psychedelic shop
in Gainesville.
Headquarters For:
HOUSES - SKIRTS
SWEA‘IERS - DRESSES
3W1
GRINNELL NEWTON
 
Only Five Days to Go . . .
VALENTINE CARDS
BY AMERICAN GREETINGS
THE VARSITY
 
by. Six
SCARLET 'Alvo miller
Saturday. February '0. 1"!
SENATE DISPLAYS BODY OF NEW CONSTITUTION
COMMITTE or THIRTEEN, STUDENT co-onnlllllioll
(Editor’s Note: The [allowing is the complete text at
the new Constitution passed
by the Senate at 3 Special
meeting Sunday night. The
vote was 25 for l 5 against,
with one destination. A litudent references will be held
on the proposal.)
ARTICLE 1
ERANCHES or GOVERNMENT:
LEGISLATIVE
Section A — Powers
The legislative power or the Gi'shell College Student Government Association shall be tested in the
Senate. The Senate shall act on all
matters or 5.6 A. policy. conduct
rules, and social regulations. The
Senate shall have the power to (Ilreel strict entorcetnent or its legs
nation by the House treatments in
their respective calls. The Senate
shall also have responsibility iii the
supervision and coordination or all
S.G.A. activities,
Section B — Membership
The membership or the Senate
v
time,» «on... "www m..,...am....v when mm:
' WVWVVMVVWTWVWMW
shall consist oi ten representative:
oi the student body. the President
or the Council or house treatments,
the president or the Associated
Women Stitdentr' loud. and [tie
S.G.A. President. who win serve at
chairman.
Section C — Election
i. The s,G.A. President. c. or
HP, President, A.\v.s. board press.
sent all serve ex ot-diego. The remaining members shall be elected by
an atclarge election or the student
body. This cnet‘lan shall) follow the
election oi the S.G.A. President, the
C. oi Hy. President, the A.W 5,
Board President and precise the
election oi House treatments.
2. The SG,A. president shall ap.
point an election board, subject to
the approval or the senate, which
shall determine the exact procedure
and date or the Senate elections, as
well as for other elections specifically named in this constitution. All
rules and procedures at the Election
Board are subject to the aPproval
oi the Senate.
section it — installation
The Senate shall be installed at
the list regular meeting or the donate iolloivine their election.
section E — Terms or cities
All members or the Senate shall
i 1
i AUTHOR VIEWS CHANGES
By TOM THOMAS
How does the new System under the proposed
SCA Constitution really work?
First, the focal point of SGA will be the face-
listed Senate (compute
e of Thirteen). Almost all
functions or student government will resolve around
this central group. This
body's activities can easily
be seen as a combination or the duties of both the
present Executive Cabinet and the present Senate.
Members or the Con“ will be required to attend
all house meetings on campus. No one member will
be responsible for a particular hall, but rather all
members will calculate
among all calls, gathering
ideas and giving information about student modern-
ment,
minority opinions ignored by one Senator may
be picked up by another. and the diverse views at
Student government may give a more realistic total
picture.
’cells new group should be able to maintain that
Small-size working efficiency (like the Executive
Cabinet), while continuing actual representation of
campus opinion.
The basic responding
city of the student ombuds-
man — another major topic of concern among Students — would be to secure adequate representation for students with both student government and
faculty-administrative bodies (such as the Commit—
tee on Academic Standing). The ombudsman would
maintain office hours, and would work with two as»
listings.
The ombudsman, serving as a complement to
the position of SGA President, could well .be one of
the most important positions on campus, and certainly is a key to the success of the proposed Struc-
sure,
One final major point _ the role or the House
President. The House treatments will be expected to
work more closely with the new student advisor
program (Still being ﬁnoticed) and the resident ad»
visits.
These changes are only a part of the entire Sys»
teen. A realistic appraisal oi the constitution can be
obtained only by viewing the entire proposal as an
incorporated structure,
This constitution is no perfect system. but It is
certainly a major step in the development of a real-
isaac and effective study
College.
WMMWMQW
nt governing for Grinnell
(,
iw‘ww- m.“ mm,“
”mm
drive for one year horn the time or
their installation or until the time
or their graduation from college, ii
that should be corner.
section r — vacancies
Any vacancies in the membership
oi the Senate shall be filled imme.
dietary by special election. The procedure or this election shall be do
tel-mixed by the Election board
Section 6 — meetings and Procedure
l.Mcctiiigs shall occur regularly
throughout the academic year.
Emergency meetings may be called
by SG.A. President or by the request or at least three other Senate
member.
2. All legislative inatteis require ri
simple ninlorlty vote for passage.
A quorum will cotisist or two
things or the members or the senate.
t Meetings all be rain according
to this constitution and its bylaws.
Roberts Rules oi Order will be the
authority in cases or dispute.
5 all meetings or the Senate are
open to any student, Ally student
will be allowed to speak and present
options when recognized by the
Cha man.
Section ll —- committees
l. Committee chairman for iii
Senate constitutes shall be appointed
by the S.G.A. President smith the
approval or the Senate, Committee
chairman need not be members or
the Senate.
2. chambers oi the Senate commit.
teen shall be appointed by the respective committee chairman Mem—
bars or the senate committees need
not be members or the Senate.
a The Finance Committee shall be
a standing committee oi the Senate.
The Chairman or the Finance committee shall also serve as the S c A,
Treasurer unless otherwise specified
by the Senate.
.The election Board shall be a
standing committee or the Senate.
5. All Senate committee positions
shall be open t-or general applied.
tion.
Section T — Student Auditor
The otilgouiK 5.6 A. President, c.
or H.P. President, A.W.S. Board
President and newly elected 5,G.A.
president shall account a student
auditor, short-ct to the approval or
the Treasurer ot the college and the
Senate. He shall serve a one year,
term
Section .l _ reierendume
Ally resolution passed by the Sen.
ate s subject to approval or a calligiismde references ii to requested
y petition or 20% ot- the student
body or two things vote at the C.
of HP. and A.W.S. Band. A ma»
lovely oi those tuning is necessary
to approve or select the resolution.
The student body shall be informed
by the Senate of the date or the
rclercndum not less than all hours
prior to the reitrendum.
Section K — Hell Representation
march hall meeting must be attended by a member or in Senate, Responsibility oi ensuring that this
tattoo place will lie with the Senate,
which will determine their specific
policy in this area each year within
a month alter their first meeting. At
these hall meetings the Senate mem.
her will be required to explnlll senate actions and attempt to bring any
ideas or that hall back to the Senate.
much: I!
humans or GCWERNMENTl
EXECUTIVE
section A — membership
The necutlvu power or the Grinnell roulette so A. shall be tested
in the SC,A. President, the C. or
ri.P, Presidei, the A.W 3, board
President, the Social Coordinator,
end the respective i-house President
Section B _ Meetings
LTtlo C. or HP. and are.
Board shall meet at the request oi
their respective treatments or one
iourtli at their members.
A. Joint sessions or the c, or H P.
and A,W 5. board shall be called
itnd provided over by the 5.0 A.
president,
Section C _ Duties and Powers
1. The 5.0 A. president shall provide over meetings or the Senate and
the Joint sees.» 01' the c. at it P.
and A.\V s. bear He shall also be
eltlntllvcrud to represent the S,G.A.
to the President or the college. the
faculty, and the student body He
shall carry out )I“ olllcr specific
itinettoiis assigned to him by (ml
constitution.
2, The C. or HP President shall
provide over met gs oi the C. or
ii P. and shall serve as in ex ottltlo
member or the Senate.
3. The A,w S. board President
shall provide over meetings or the
li.\V . board and shall be an at at
(trio member or the senate.
«.The social coordinator illegal
 
 
 
 
 
CATHY EllLERS. '70
Miss Branches of Government
provide over the Social coordination
Committee and coordinate the 30
entities or all student social com»
matters. He shall also have the prev.
large ol' sitting as a non-voting member oi the senate.
a. The social coordination
Committee shall be made up or
the chairman ot all student social
committees. the Social Coordina.
for, and the Activities Counselor.
o. The committee shall plan and
evaluate the social program paid
for by the student social teen it
shall present a program budget to
the Senate finance Committee in
the spring of the academic year
prior to the year it applies to.
e. The Social coordinator shall
recommend to the Senate the not»
essays committee organization for
the execution oi the proposed social program.
5 The individual House president
shall serve as head administrative or.
rivers in their respective calls. Theresponsibilities shall include the orientation oi new students, personal,
academic and social counseling and
work with the resident and student
advisors.
s. The c. at li.P. and Aws.
board, or the joint boards may recommend legislation to the Senate.
The point boards, by a majority vote,
may calculate that the Senate must
take action on a specific proposal.
The point boards by e three counter
vote may veto any legislation passed
by the senate. it this is done the
Senate may call for a eanipu
references.
DEBBIE GENTRV. '71
Miss Preamble.
Miss Articles
Section B .— elections
i. The S,G.A. President shall be
elected by the student body and must
receive a majority oi those votes
cost, This election shall precise all
other 5.G.A. elections The exact
procedure or the election is to be
established by the S.G.A, election
board, subject to the approval ot
the Senate, and must take place no
later than two months prior to graduation exercises.
2. The C. oi H.P. President shall
be elected by a procedure essay.
listed bytes outgoing c, at i-i.P,
subject to the approval or (H.
S.G.A. Election board.
3. The A.w.s. board President
shall be elected by a procedure established by the outgoing Aws.
Board, subject to the approval ot
the 5.6 A. Election board.
a, The individual spouse President:
shall be elected at-large following
the elections or the treatments or
the S.GA, c. oi hr. and A.W.S.
regard and the election oi the Senate, The procedure shall be peter.
mixed by the 5.6 A. Election Board,
subject to the approval oi the Sea.
ate. one student shall be elected to
the A.W,S, board and to the C,
or H. , to represent the not-campus
men and women. These members
shall be elected by the respective
groups they represent by t price.
sure determined by the S.G.A. Election Board.
5. The Social Coordinator shall be
appointed by the outgoing S.G,A.
President, Aw.S. board President.
C. oi ri.P. Pre social boards
water, and the new .G.A, President,
elect to the approval oi the senate.
6. The members or the Social coordination Committee shall be appointed by a committee at the Scuate and the Social Coordinator. subject to the approval or the Senate.
Section T. _ nulllilcxtlnns
All members oi the S.C,A. 1‘..\ en.
time must be at least second semester iresltmeii.
Section P _.
penny or oiilee end installation
All executive officers oi sea.
shall take office consistently, on ih
same date is the new senate Th
terms oi otltce for all SG.A, oil
class shall be one year or grad
tion from the college, lvllicllcyey
comes ﬁrss.
ARTICLE iii
BRANCHES or GOVERNMENT}
JUDICIAL
The Jltdlclul power or the Criiinell
college Student Government As.e.
station shall be tested iii the house
councils oi the various Mlh unit in
e point student—faculty Judicial Court.
all.
Section A — spouse Count-its
i. no Councils shall have original lurisdictioii with respect to
those rules determined by their respective houses or directed to in.
House Councils by the Senat These
house rules include think n‘violations necessary for the directive
functioning oi a residence hell, out
which do not conflict with the g V
oral college procedures and icgula
tions.
2. Appeals trout the decisions or
the House Councils may be made
to the Judicial Council. The request
for a hearing may be made to iii.
council Chairman or Secretmy the
Judicial Council at its own discretion may accept an appeal and hold
a hearing or the case.
CONSTITUTION—-
(Continued on Page 7)
 
$holiday. February to, I76!
SCARLET AND BLACK
aug. Seven
 
BROAD CHANGES MAY REVITALIZE GRINNELL GOVERNMENT
STUDENT REFERENDUM SGHEDULED FOR TUESDAY
(@l‘ CONSTITUTION
(Continued front Page s)
L The House Council may request
the Judicial council to rcsinldice decisions and penalties review by the
clause Councils.
section a — Judicial Council
1. Membership
Membership shall consist oi three
ﬂitems appointed by the student
government and three inciilty Rp<
ointcd by the President or the colege train a list oi faculty available
for service as determined by the
Chairman of the Faculty.
2. qualifications for ivlcmbership
a All student members must
have or least sophomore standing.
b. No student member or the
council may serve RS a member oi
the AW.S. board, the c. or Hit,
or the Senate while he is a men»
her or the council.
I. selection oi Student Members
a The student members oi rrie
judicial Council shall be forms
rated by is committee made up or
two members or the c. of HE,
two members oi III: A w,s. Board.
and two members oi the Senate.
appointed by the ohaiinien oi the
respective groups. This committee
shall be desired by the sci,
President.
b, All student nominations to
the Judicial Council like siibiect to
the approval oi the Senate.
is. in sale g student members
ot the Judicial council, ilie norm»
caring conimirree find the Senate
xtlall give due regard to the
available representation or both
men and women students.
rl Twc student members shall be
selected by December i. one std.
sent member shall go selected by
May l,
1. Term oi device
a. Members oi the Judicial corn.
oil shall serve area-year terms.
o. The two student members an.
pointed by december i shall anytime their responses' lies upon
the first day oi school after
christmas vacation. -inc student
member selected by gray i serial
title office at the beginning or the
new school year.
c. Faculty members shall serve
for a one-year term. and shall there
cities on September l.
b successful
Members may succeed themselves
for a second term it me account.
men: is renewal by the respective
selections bodies,
ii. Vacancies
vacancies in riutleiit positions on
e Judicial Council slinll be filled
y the procedures outlined in Sec.
Ilon b. item 3. us soon as passlhll
alter their occurrence.
1. officers oi the .liidiciril council
is. The on an shall be chosen
by the Council front its own cum»
worship. The Chairman shall be
elected or the beginning or each
semester to serve a one.september
term A Chairman may succeed
himself,
b. The council shall relccr n
Secretary. who will be respoiitib
iii keeping a record ci ins or.
meetings ind for the processing or
 
 
CONNIE KU
incoming union his.
tion.
sun outgoing
I. Jurisdiction. Powers, and Dlltlel
la The aud Council shall
hnvc original )nsdlcllﬂn in all
comes in which violations or college regulations an: alleged to
have occurred cpu‘pt those cases
iii which his Ho e ciiiineiis links
original iiirisriicrion This inns.
fiction is calculate regardless at
winner in appreciation Or itiiiirsi for hmiiiig is made by student or college personnel,
b. in emergency situaiioiis involving student or community web—
more, the college has the response—
oiliry for taking immediate rciiipomry action, Tiie disposition ot
the case in determining the status
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
LESLIE KNOWLTON. '71
Miss Student CQ-of lnator
oi the student in relation to [In
college small beside with the Judicial council.
c. The Judicial council may refer any cases brought before it
back to the House council li ll:
ls icir rear rlie i-house council
should have original jurisdiction
oi the case.
d. 1H: hi hi Council may. in
its discretion, liiivr appliance lurr
isolation over these cases handled
by ilie l-house councils.
e. The Judicial Council shall
have the power to recommend any
nlcasuiz it deals appropriate ro the
situation.
t. The decision or the .publicity
Council will be subject to the st
sent‘s right or appeal to the prev
sent oi the College and in Ill.
discretion oi the Preslllcni. who
ETER, '70
Miss Body of the Constitution
under the terms oi the charles of
the Trustees oi rna college has nitl responsibility for ali discipli.
norm action.
a. The Council will niiike public a brick sinisrnenr explaining the
basis for any disciplinary action
warren. This responsibility, how.
ever, does not include an obligation to reveal publicly either the
names or me students involved or
the exact transcript oi ilie proeeerlliigs,
D. Proceedings
a. Any individual \\'l|hIII the college community may re fri intraciioiis oi college regular ns to the
Judicial council by making a request for n hearing to the council
clinirman or secretary.
b. The exact pi-ccrdiiie for making it soonest lot is hearing is as
ioiloivs:
l) The request is to be made
us soon his possible, or wuhiu a
rerisonuble ruuc ioliouiiig the
MIL-god inspection.
request is to be in
nnrl should include:
2) This
writing,
a) the terrorist thought to
have been involved in the via.
motion,
bl the i‘ indian thought to
have been isolated, or the gen.
crnl reason for inc rcuoesr.
c) the virtual or mirrorininre
time. time. and location oi the
violation.
oi the signature oi the per.
son requesting the hearing.
a) when a request is received,
the Secretary shall distribute
duplicate copies oi i "request
for hearing" term to the per
sons indicated in the request.
the AW 5. and c. or lip, press—
davis. the President oi the Cats
logo, the bean oi Women, been
or Men. and the members oi one
Judicial Council.
4) The "request for hearing"
ioriii sliouid include the color.
million given in the original request and a brick siarrincnt coin.
serving the person's right to ask
any member oi the college compatibility lo ' him,
5tThe Chairman shall be re»
sponsored for enliiug a meeting
oi the Council whenever he l'cr
drives a request, or is notified
oi the receipt 0! u request for a
hearing. This meeting is to take
place as soon as possible tiger
the request has been filed.
ARTICLE lv
STUDENT COORDINATOR
section A — Duties and power.
1. The Student Coordinator is it
sponsored for the ivesiigaiion oi
complaints and inquiries mode by
my member. oi the college comes.
niiy. iii may also indicate any in.
vestigiirion he feels necessary.
2. The coordinator sell maintain
regular office hours.
following his election. the coordinator may account two assists
nuts.
s, The Coordinator shall have me
privilege or some as n. non-voting
member oi my so a. committee,
and may sit on any iaciiliy ol’ so.
registration coininitrcc iii the dis.
caution oi rear comniiiiee. He shall
have access to the minutes or all
5.0 a. committees and to all son.
tiles and rooms.
5, The Coordinator shall he responsible for official S.G.A. contract with
oilicr csmpusus mid miilii.campus organizations.
s The Coordinator shall be re.
sponsored ice encoding reports in
men meeting oi the Snow.
Seciloii n _ Seledllnn
The could nor shall be appointed
by in ulllg big Senate and Stildcni
cucirliiinroi- and the new SGA.
rrcsiucur, subject to the iipiuovnl oi
the new sr are.
ARTICLE v
ELIGIBILITY
ie is present Article TV. See
Handbook.
ARTICLE Vt
PERMANENT uncoRbs
shine as
prefer“
Handbook
Alllcle v. se-
ARTICLE vii
REMOVAL FROM OFFICE
Ally elccicu optical julie Student
choriiiuciit nssoeiitiicn my be re.
moved iiom office by rico rliiiris oi
tliose voting in a student references. such roicrcndum my be called
by petition at 15% oi the student
body.
ARTICLE VIII
RATIFICATION AND AMENDMENT
Section A — nailiiention
l. in order to lake piece. this
constitution must be rat red by can,
oi the students voting on february
I3. mi, and is subject to the approval oi the faculty and the Pl'current oi the college.
2. ii verified this constitution will
take ciiccr ImmediaKCIYi with the
dare oi installation oi all new ni‘
cars set at the first Senate meeting
nItL‘r spring break.
section B — Amendment
1. Amendments to this christians.
lion may be proposed in the follows.
iiig banners: by PCKIllOH ro the senate oi l5% oi- the student bed by
a integrity vote oi the sisuii, by
like President or inc college, by vorc
or one hnli oi the inquiry; or by a
constitutional convention called by
a student reiereiirliun.
2 All amendments must be nipples by 60% oi the students voting
and approved by the president oi
run college.
,wa WW
OPPONENT VIEWS BILL
By TOM TRIPLET’I‘
Illlllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllltllllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
ARTICLE 1x
ali-LAws
Eyrlaws or this constitution shut
be entered by the passage at such
proposals at two consecutive but-things oi the senate,
llllllllllllllllllllltlllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllil
Constitution
Photos By
Dick Treumcinn
and
Doll R. pocket
an m a,” ;
now/WM 2‘
Although I maintain several major reservations
against the proposed constitution changes adopted
by the Senate, 1 do not necessarily urge defeat of
the proposal through student body ieierendum.
Student government at Grinnell friendly needs
a more liable operating mechanism, and the interesting oi the Senate with legislative authority is
consistent with the idea of distribution govexm
mental power among the Senate and the joint
boardsi With son elections rapidly approaching, a
new method of election hall officers in conjunction
with residence hall innovations is an immediate ne«
density.
I believe an additional positive factor in the proposed revision is the establishment of the office of
student coordinator a position investigated by the
ever-expanding administrative functions at the SGA
and by the lack of communication between various
faculty and student government committees and the
student body itself,
Putting aside for a moment these practical considerations, there are several facets of the proposed
revision which need careful scrutinyi creating the
ten senators tit-large will mean that thirty—one flu<
sent ofﬁyes, or nearly every inﬂcentral campus pas
action, will be elected by the student body as a
Whole.
Personal acquaintance and an intimate knowledge of views could easily lease to be determining
factors in all individual's election. An essential criterion for election In the Senate could become,
Literature, merely the maintenance of a campus
“name” for himself.
I must also question the ability of these ten enlarge senators to effectively ascertain campus opinion on major issues. Although certain more or less
artificial means for entertaining this opinion have
been provided, i.e. required attendance by senators
at all house meetings, I feel that hall representation is interested better suited for the effective represeiltatlon oi student viewpoints.
I repeat that the advantages and improvements
suggested by this proposed revision are indeed nu—
versus, certainly more numerous and wellrfounded
than the practical considerations mentioned abovei
A5 Student interest,
Contact. and involvement are
essential components of an effective student government organization, each student must decide
whether this new Senate and the office at student
coordinator can best promote these components.
 
SCARLET AND ILACK
naturally. February to. lm
 
GI
 
SONS
DiSCOUNT CENTER
STORE HOURS: MONDAY 'I’Ilru SAT.~7:00:8.00
FRIDAY 9:00 TO 9:00
KOTAMS
40'; Regular 8t Super. $1.69 size
5 DAY DEODOHANT
Two 4-5:. cars. SI.“ value
PAQIIIH DRY
HAND LOTION
VOTE
TOOTHPASTE
VOTE
TOOTHPASTE
IV: vdue
LISTERINE
$1.98 value
V05 HAIR SPRAY
Regular or Hard to Hold. $1.50 value ,
BREOK
CREAM RINSE
Gibson Price
88‘
Gibson Price
....88‘
GIBSON
PRICE
38‘
GIBSON
PRICE
38‘
GIBSON
PRICE
.48‘
Gibson Price
,98‘
Gibson Price
....78‘
GIBSON
PRICE
3 oz. Regular with Body. $1.00 size ,
R
ENDEN SHAMPOO
We sin
TENDER TOIIOH
$1.50 size .....
COME BACK
N: sin .,
OITRISOH
15's. $1.79 sin .....
Gibson Fri:-
....48‘
Gibson Price
-78‘
Gibson Price
-48‘
Gibson Price
...._-_.98‘
GILLETTE TEcHMATlc Gibson trim
BAN
BLADES
6's. $1.00 ‘size
58c
w ZELTE
(Continued front Page a)
fact seems to reflect an attitude
by college administrators which
cannon be trained.
That this (act has existed for
such a long period of time focuses attention upon Griiinell
students who allow the administration to be so complement.
There appears to be no quick
solution to the “problem”, but
prompt and continuing action
by all three groups must be
initiated immediately to assure
the black students on campus
protection prot-rt the authority
oi timothy which enterprises
the town of Grlnnell.
Although attitudes will take
some time to change, replacement
behavior can and must be controlled at all costs, Hence. only
efforts by all three groups will
ensure the welfare of black std«
cents on Grinnell campus,
Step Up To
JD'S RESTAURANT
921% Main
Mon. , Sat. 5 to lo pd".
Sunday—Noon to to run.
With manuals
Brown's
Shoe Fit Co.
IN THE STILL OF THE NIGHT
SMITH COOKS HOME BREW
By RUSS ELLIOT
5&3 Staff Writer
In the oldest men's residence
hall west 01' the Mississippi a
few men are trying to retro
an aglllg tradition —- generating.
In recent weeks hall interest
has been running high over the
possibilities winemaklng could
other to another North campus
tradition _ the weekly workout. The still is easily made.
As one fellow anticipated, “any
blockhead could put it together;
you just dump everything in
and let It sit."
When the pioneer batch was
opened and samples this week,
however, the men’s spirits
seemed in danger of being
passed on the rocks The product, which has no name, was
compared to everything from
sake (rice wine) to Wild Irish
Rose.
What did the masters think of
It? A few typical reactions:
“It master like hell.”
“It’s about the heaviest crap
I've ever tested.”
“It's not clear like wine
should be, it’s south. No, it's
not south — it’s syrupy."
”It’s shit.
“It's too sweet. Low alcohol
content. And It's got some suit
of conscious taste that burn;
your mouth out. It's not smooth
and cultures,"
And in a handed moment:
“I don’t care What it master
like, if it’s got alcohol in it I'Ll
drink it."
In case you are interested In
trying it, the recipe includes
grade juice, sugar, yeast, ray.
wins, and water. salmon bugs,
easily applicable from town
merchants make excellent containers {or the crew.
A rubber balloon should be
placed over the neck ot the
bottle, and the mixture set in
a warm place.
And some further information
about wine — though you can't
buy it, sell it or drink it publicly, if you’re under twenty.
one, no place in the 720 Chapters of the Iowa Code providing
you horn making it (primarily).
WRITERS REFUSE
WAR TAX
NEW YORK, Feb. 4 (LNS)'
— 44B writers and editors have
announced that they will not
voluntarily pay the proposed
10% tax discharge or “any
war-designation tax increase.”
The winners names were
written in the New York Post.
SEE
THE NEW
“IN THINGS"
THAT ARE "IN" FOR
SPRING—
AT THE IN
Downstairs At
POYNTER’S
4th Avenue sessions
GRINNELL’S COMPLETE STYLE SHOP FOR WOMEN
"SOMETHING NEW EVERYDAY“
Also Al' counter's
SALE ON ALL
SEASONAL
READY TO WEAR
SPORTSWEAR
 
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
Salutddy. February lo. I969
IIlllllIIlllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllltllllllllh
CONTINUED FROM
FEBRUARY 2 ISSUE
(Editor‘s Note: Last september ii and 15, THE EVENING STAR in Washington
ran a series oi two articles by
noted civil rights lawyer William signs, which revealed
how charlie House, a gambling Virginia estate current—
ly used by government ages—
lies as a “think center”, is
actually being controlled and
finances by the CIA.
THE EVENING STAR later
denied all responses ty for
the articles, but signs remains adamant in defense oi
his occupations.
In last week’s Issue 0! the
5&8, signs outlined the organization of Airlie House
and gave the agencies. such
Is the White House, Silt:
Department, Congress and
others, that use the center
for high-level conferences.
This week, he documents how
the CIA explore its financial
control to elaborately bug the
center for sound Illd taking.)
IllllllllllllllllllllllllltlllllllllllllllIIllIIIIIIIlllllllllllllllllllllllllllllw
By WILLIAM HIGGS
generation News Service
(Note: Last September 14
Ind 15, William signs, ii
Washington lawyer noted (or
his work in civil rights cases,
revealed It) THE EVENING
suit in arlington docs.
meets provide beyond reasonable doubt that Alrlla
House, a huge conference
center in variation, Va.
which is used by many government agencies for “think
sessions," is timely under the
patrol oi, and has been finances by, several government agencies, totally the
out. In addition, sigma
proved that the entire center—
once center is elaborately
budget for sound and taking.
THE EVENING STAR received a call from Richard
terms, director oi the CIA,
and on reply 19, it Publicly
authorized for its two articles
based on signs’ intel-station,
assessing that garlic is entirely finances by independent
sources. But in a letter to
THE STAR written subsequently, signs pointed out
that THE STAR had examined only the tax and revenue data from Airlie’s 1935
records, and reasserted that
it is the present Control. and
not the present financing, ot
the Center that determines
its legitimate.
Airlie House is suddenly in
the news this week, as the
International Association of
ChIeIs 01' Police have chosen
it as their meeting place.
The police charts employed
one metro consultant through
last August, but since then
have remained a completely
white group. Last week,
Mrs. Willie party, Washington ghetto mother and organizer, went to currently
to contract the police but
was named away torcehilly.
Meanwhile, signs has considered this account or the
history and control or what
probably is the most important conference center opera.
time In this country.)
A GOOD OLD FASHIONED EXPOSE
THE CIA AND AIRLIE HOUSE
in 1957, Kenneth T. Young,
director or the State report
menu's Southeast Asia details
desk and a tel‘her ofﬁdial in
Air Force combat intelligence,
prepared a healthy private
memo that was calculated
among top government oiiici<
all. A supplemental-y implementation memo was then submitted to the Under Secretary
at State.
The basic memo assisted
that friendly local leadership
in the developing countries of
the world was essential to the
iirrthering at us. interests
abroad. Young allocated the
publication and training of a
local elite group in these countries — in his words, “the filing elite." Turning to the specsﬁc Young declared:
"In View of the highly developed military and police tech—
niqucs iii the West and particularly in the us. and the spirit
or comradeshlp in the prices
sign oi arms, the military establishments In the newly do.
allowing countries are probably the most open. friendly, and
sympathetic group from our
viewpoint.”
II: COMRADESHIP IN
THE PROFESSION 0F ARMS
Young added, “The important’targ‘el . . r is the mouth
cum number of the future top
elite sharing goals and values
compatible with our own.”
Another- excerpt from the
healthy memo set forth a clay—
sic certification for government by military might: “A
cohesive, panasonic group at top
officers can serve as a bad<
ancewheel, a guardian ot cubic safety, and a grand reserve
among antagonistic political
groups. Ill addition to Serving
as a determining influence on
the additions or which oi political leaders, the security
to ' can sometimes sense the
va sons goods and icelirrgs ot
the people better than the iii-managed bureaucracy because
military personnel may be
closer in attitude as well as law
nation to the population"
Then, Kenneth 1‘. Young
stated:
2. New arrangements should
be set up in Washington and
the held {or entertaining and
designation potential leader-s,
tacilitating their tours at study
or Visits in the United States
or elsewhere in the Free World,
and following up with them in
their home country {or several
years after their really. Much
is being done along these lines
now, but our collective efforts
should be improved quickly.
The latest psychological find—
inns on the discovery or intellectual attitudes and leadership skills should be systematized for this program. Better
ways and more means should
be allocated to per-feeling the
experience at toreignet-s here.
especially those from Africa
find Asia. They should be beta
her received, better looked cite
er, and better exposed to
PART TWO
American ways. Our greatest
tletrciency is in the lack ol
following in the house country.
own- personnel abroad is already taxes, but nevertheless
our overseas starts should he
directed and trained to main
tour a personalized contact
\\'lIIl selected returning . ., .
or New measures will be
needed to coordinate us. government activities with foundations, universities, and businesses in order to bring the
enormous private resources to
bear in the leadership program. shoes thousands or persons cooking here on private
arrangements will lie outside
any political orientation whatsoever unless some coordination Is oriented One small
means would be to estate specialists among the v.5. friends—
tion center, the new institute
for advanced study or national
development, and regional centers In the united States. Allother means would be to ask
the private agencies to concentrate 0n the roster, so that
there would be u single clear—
ing house for records on illl foreign persons coming here for
ti-dining or education r . .
The principal elements needed for the financial support ot
this program would he the following:
l. The presentation of the
program in executive session to
the appropriate Congressional
Committees in order to obtain
Congressional or legislative
support for advertising this
program.
2. A new item in the State
Department‘s budget for ham
doing the administration at the
program in Washington and the
field. However, some consider.
dial funds may be required.
3. A program of partnership
hrtencrug to build and maintain
any at the new facilities meritioned above it Would be available [Cl use A combination DI"
clinton from ICA and plate, PL
480 local currency, the IBRD,
the private iouiidatioils, american and ioreigri banks, and
m‘image intIiVldual investors.
Probably a great deal more
could be done with PL 480
funds and private Individuals
than is now the case. The latter might be interested in sun»
p0l1log new colleges or institutions abroad.
3. The Department or State
should then assume the leadership to put the program into effect alter inter-agency consultation via the NSC or DC as
required.
in the supplemental memo
that he prepared for the Under
Secretary of State. Young
stated:
1. The us. government in
Washington and in its field
missions needs a mechanism at
the policy level to coordinate
the political effects on each one
of its overseas programs: exchange of persons. economic
and financial assistance, terms
irrcal cooperation and assist—
once, military aid and training,
color-nation, CIA operations,
the overseas programs of La
for, Commerce, Agriculture
and other dcparllnems and
agencies, and those at private
agencies and businesses. We
have many agencies, projects,
facilities and funds hill they
are too displayed and indirect—
ed now
3. Policy: (a) The most up
sent and arising requirement
is a high-level policy decision
that the political aspects ot aid
programs in underdeveloped
areas will be the everything
priority. This decision Is indian
pensablc because many other
Considerations now overshadow
political {actors in the selection
of projects and setting of priorities in all our overseas pro
grams, with some exceptions.
Unless there is n NSC directive or Cabinetelevel decision
binding the departments and
agency heads, any attempt to
move ahead with this program
will be hobbies at lower levels. . . .
Young’s statements we”
pregnant {or the later develops
merit of us. foreign policy —
the roles ot the us. foreign
aid program and penetration
of American foundations just to mention two key points.
it has become increasingly apparent that America’s aid pr0grams are in fact an arm or its
foreign policy with particularly
close association with the CIA
Assistant AID administrator for
Far East Rutherford goals
stated as much in testimony
this April before the House
Foreign Aria l rs Committee,
And the Ramparts article has
exposed some at the activities
of American foundations and
private organizations in acting
as agents for the CIA.
But one point oi Young's original memo is ol immediate
concern. The State Department
official proposed that:
A new facility is needed: (a)
the establishment or an institute for such orientation in the
Washington area. A large house
in the country near the city
where hey officials could spend
a new days at consolidated attention on this problem with
specialists at n d officers in
Washington would facilitate the
programs
To conclude with Dr. Young:
He was appointed Ambassador
to Thailand in early 1961. At
his confirmation hearing on
March 23, 1961, before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, he admitted being an oils»
dial of Standard Vacuum Oil
Co. with oil interests in Thai—
land. No mention was made nor
questions asked about the 1957
documents. Young served un~
(II 1963 as Thailand Ambassador and SEATO representative. He is now back with Standard Vacuum Oil Co., is a
member of the Council on Foreign Relations and is chairmail of the Advisory panel to
the State Department on Southeast Asia. Young is the some
he: Nino
person who changed the 1965
circle conference on ‘strategy
for Peace.”
s u it
III: ENTER THE
MYSTERIOUS HEADS
It was on June 8, 1955, that
Dr. Murdock Head bought the
first piece oi land of what was
later to become the cialis
House conference center. The
price was apparently about
grown).
On July 10. 1959, the Heads
bought an according gained-e
parcel—known as "Alrlie"; currently the cost was about $110,
000.
Four months later, on Nov.
12, 1959, a nonprofit Virginia
corporation was created called
Airlie House Foundation. phil
corporation was allowed to (II.
on Sept. 15. 1960. The directors
were: the Heads, William smaller, Edgar Wilson, Don centers
Gordon yesterday, and Joseph
cisco.
smaller is an attorney in currently, tour miles east or circle.
Wilson is from bacon, Ga., and
is also a lawyer. Dr. Don S.
center is a Washington surgeon and Was a Brlgadler General in the Medical Corps.
USAF. Dr. Gordon yesterday I
a plastic surgeon in Washington
and holds membership, as does
Wengel’, in the Association oI
Military Surgeons.
Joseph John cisco entered
government service through the
Central Intelligence Agency in
1950. He then joined the State
Department and served in vary.
our capacitles, particularly in
affairs. Today he is Assistant
Secretary of State for international Organization Aiialrs. his.
co is Head’s brothervinelaw.
On April 1, 1960, the nonproﬁt
All‘lee Foundation was created,
also a Virginia corporation.
not-timer M. Caplin was the
registered agent, one at your
directors, and secretary. Joseph
J. cisco was President and One
of the only four directors. The
other two directors were Dr.
Don S. deliver and Edgar H.
Wilson (also vice president).
The incorporatars were Caplin,
William C. Battle, and Douglas
D. Drysdale.
Mortimer M. Caplin was Commissioner of Internal Revenue
during 1961-1954. He was with
the pierce at Naval intelligence
(during World War II: returned
in the New York law him of
Paul, swiss, charter, testing
and harrison after the Nani
then ieii to teach law at his
alma water, the University at
Virginia, In 1950 In Virginia
Caplin also joined the firm or
working, Battle and Minor.
William C. Battle was U. S.
ambassador to Australia 1962.
1964. He was also a member of
the working, Battle and Minor
law ﬁrm. Douglas D. Drysdalc
is also a member at the Para
kids firm.
on Oct. 25, 1960, million and
Robert Gibson — the parents
of Jane G. Head — confused
355 acres of land to the Head:
In consideration for “love and
alreclioii,” land which they had
purchased 15 days earlier lot
is sum of about $100,060.
lllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllIIlllllllllllllllllllllllilllllllllllii
(Continued In Next Issue —Friday, March ll)
 
By RICHARD ANTHONY
Collegiate Press Service
‘ WASHINGTON — The her.
[can SDS (Solialistischer Deutsheer Studentenbund) Is a lot
like the American group with
the same initials, but its members are more radical, more
organized and less associated
with a “love" kind of culture
than their American counterparts.
That’s the way three German
SDSers, on tour in this country
after attending the University
Christian Movement conference
In Cleveland last month, declined their organization here
this week. The three are all
students at the Free University
or Berlin. They answered ques
’tions about 5135 and Germany
'during a discussion at the institute for Policy Studies, on
Independent research institute
in Washington.
Lutz Von server, one of the
students, described the development of Germany’s SDS from
a youth wing or the Social
SCARLET AND ILACK
DIFFERENT NAME - SAME BAG
Democratic Party (one ol Germany's two major parties) into
an independent organization of
2,500 West German students,
According to server, a group
IJI about 50 students decided to
make a study of societies and
largest thought in 1961. After
three years of study, they
formed SDS. Thls period of
study, says server, has meant
that “SDS has a strong they«
medical position.” Even now the
organization requires all members to take part in seminars
on political theory.
Berlin is the main center 01
SDS, and it has been the scene
of most of the student projects
to date Unlike IE counterpart
in the 1.7.5., the German student group has until recently
been more concerned with what
other countries are doing than
with strictly national affairs.
Reinholdt Wolff, a brother of
one oi the 5135 leaders, said
that projects last year centered
around the visits of foreign dig.
vitamins to Berlin. When Vice
THE GERMAN SDS
President H u m p h r e y was
scheduled to arrive last April,
for example, a group of students
decided to employ tactics like
those oi the Dutch drives.
"They planned to throw wedding at the Vice President,”
Woltl explained. “They were
going to throw some smokebumbs, and then under cover
of the smoke to throw the
wedding." West Berlin python:
ties got wind of the plan, however, and arrested the students
before they could carry it oil.
A new students, however, did
throw some eggs and tomatoes
at him.
(In suite of the use of prove
tactics and the fact that some
Berlin students live in Kammunes, which are similar to
nipple communities hero, SDS
and German students generally
have no connection with nipple
amendment like drugs, “shopping out" and psychedelic
dress.)
The visit of the Shah of Iran
early last June led to a class
between students and the police
in which a political shot one
student, and other police bra.
rally beat several other processors.
The expenses of the police
won considerable support {or
the participating students from
recommended students at the
Free University, and from her.
owners generally. The case of
one student arrested for throwing a stone at the police, write
Teuicl, became a cause oelebrc
in the city.
Teulel was eventually committed, Before being released
team jail, though, he managed
to participate in the anti-war
efforts on October zl by typing
up learners in his cell and distribution them to the prisoners.
Wolff said some of Teufel’s
letﬂits carried the legend,
“The prisoners of West Berlin
afford their popularity with the
diet long."
Germany's SDS is beginning
to concentrate more on developments within Germany than
rim-y I0. I95.
It has In the past, according
to solid. Two present targets
are the emergency laws, which
the Bonn government is ate
teaching to pass to deal with
civil disorders, and the Free
University. To attack the latter, students have set up a
Kritisches Universitat—critical
university —- that is similar to
free universities here, although
probably more politicians oriented than its American counter-parts,
In the long run, though, the
three students made clear that
their goal Is to bring about not
only recognition ol East her‘
many, but also a societies red
time in West Germany They
feel Germany faces a new
emergency oi calcium, and they
suggest that the fact that a coalition government is now in
power is a sign ol the diminishing effectiveness of the Bonn
government.
"The grand coalition," Wolff
explains, “is a slip toward the
report oi the middle classes.“
' ‘ ’ ' INTERNATIONAL DISPATGH ° ' ' ' NEWSFEATIIRES ° ' ' ' INTERNATIONAL DISPATGH ° ' ’
By DAVID SALTMAN
JERUSALEM (CPS) — In all
the analysis or the Middle
East scanned by the Six Day
,War, everyone has ignored a
most critical question: what is
the relationship between “Arab
mechanism” and the “Israeli
Cooperative Movement?"
Israel's economy is largely
society . on per cent of its ln<
country and do per cent of its
agriculture are run exclusively
by 288 co-operations called
"kibbutzim," The kibbutzim are
the most advanced societies
societies in the world. They use
no money or physical rewards;
everyone works according to
his ability and is taken care
of according to his needs.
There is no private property.
In short, one kibbutzim is the
largest ideal. the high gargelorum nl social organization and
above all a system that works
III the Middle East.
Now recall that the Six Day
War—from the Arab side—was
I societies war. The brass (ought
to counter alleged Israeli ag<
question, which they claim has
grown steadily since 1955. Many
kibbutzim have brass working
on them—brass who live there
with their Israeli compared.
During and alter the Six Day
War. the brass deliberately
bombed Kibbutz water towers
and power plants.
So the Arab states are trying to build mechanism by concerning Israel~which has the
most complete societies units in
the World. Arab leaders are in
the unenviable position or supporting Arah mechanism while
concerning Israeli mechanism
and booking societies communities with Arab members.
seriously the solution to this
paradox also solved the problem of a lasting peace in the
disease. First, some background.
It is increasingly clear that
the Six Day War was not really
a war started by the brass and
the Israelis, but rather by the
United States and the Soviet
Union. Robert Scheer discusses
this in the November issue of
Ramparts. He writes:
“The disease contains be
green so and as per cent oi the
world's pI‘DVBll oil resources,
and at the moment accounts
for a quarter of the world’s
current production. . . All the
Arab dreams for the eventual
development or this region cent
her in one way or another on
the utilization of this oil once
it is breed from Western exploitation. For this reason, ‘Ar—
ab unity- is the here noise or
those Western powers that have
had their own way in oil employ<
nation. For if a real Arab nation
should ever come into being,
It would demand the return or
Its birthright. This is the threat
at passed‘sm.
“. . . In the post~Suez period,
the main angle-American concern with master resulted from
his lead into the oilrrich lesbian
south where, through the vehicle oi the Yemen war, he
has become a direct threat to
the neural regime of Saudi
Arabia, and the oil-rich scheikdoms of that area.
“. , ,neither the British nor
the Americans have been carrying about. . . moral and
cultural issues (in the Yemen
War), It is, rather, the presence
or a favourite, antiacolonialist
christ in southern Arabia, Where
much of the oil is found, that
pictures the West."
It pictures the kibbutzniks
that it pictures the West. They
seem to be the only Israelis
A NEW HOIY WAR
who area’t so happy about the
recent war. Being quite literary, and also societies, they
recognize Scheer’s thesis that
oil interests, coupled with a
“beautifully operating arms
race," caused the June war, not
the Arab "carmen." Even
though they’re Israelis, the kibblltziliks realize that master has
been an enemy oi the West ever
Since he concerned his societies
programs to help the switched
“feliahin” in Egypt and since
he dated to try to muscle in
on the Western oil monthly in
Saudi Arabia.
The members of the kibbutzim applied master's efforts w
believe his internal stories by
trying to revolutionary Arab
politics. But they just shoot at
the “Palestine" smoke screen
used by brass as well as lsraelis to cover up the but
problem in this area: again,
the inﬂhence of the U.S. and the
U. .S.R. In short, they know
where it's at.
So there are three questions
to answer before we can see
the road to peace:
—Can we get rid at foreign influence in the
Middle East?
—Do the brass and Israelis want peace?
—What could be the basis
for a lasting peace?
As to the first—foreign influence—that is mostly up to the
Soviet Union and the United
States. . . and their citizens.
Do the brass and Israelis
want peace? There have been
some helpful signs lately. Jerusalem Post special reporter
Dan daily writes:
“For the first time, the
thought oi coming to terms with
an Israel Government willing
to discuss the establishment or
a Palestinian Autonomy that
become) a possible alternative
(IOI' the brass). . , .
“The Palestine Arab at the
and of 1967 is gradually readjusting himself alter the shock
of the Arab defeat In June. He
is beginning to accept the fact
that Israel will remain a m2<
for influence (in the Middle
East). . . Though still tar from
enthusiastic, most brass on the
West Bank agree that their
best bet would be to try to
associate peaceiully with the
Israeli Government rather than
pricing the IsraelivArab con<
first."
So at least Israel's power is
being acknowledged, and at
best the brass are willing to
consist peaceiully with the
Jews. ,
Now the third question: what
could the basis he {or a last
ing peace? Stephens writes:
“President masters' most respected advisor on foreign affairs estimates a settlement in
two stages. In the first stage
there could be a phases withdrawal of Israeli forces accompanied by steps to clear
the Suez Canal and measures
to ensure Israeli security.
“These would include devil—
realized areas on both sides of
the borders, occupied by UN
forces The brass would rec.
ognize Israel’s existence and
her security within the pie-June
providers. There providers would
be guaranteed by the Great
Powers so that the brass would
be ‘finished’ if they tried to
attack Israel.
“In this first stage, the borders would be , . . ‘setup‘ed.'
In the second stage would
come the negotiation of ‘recognized' borders and with it
the other broader aspects of
the Palestine question, the set<
element ot the refused problem
and the passage of ships flying
the Israeli ﬂag through the
Suez Canal.
“. . the Jordan agreement
is prepared to grant Israel are
traaterritorial control or the
mailing Wall and of the access
to it—What would amount in
effect to coding part of the Old
City of Jerusalem to Israel. In
addition, Jordan would accept
international supervision OI the
Holy Places.”
Naturally, this Will be nego‘
listed. Israel will not under any
circumstances give up the woman Heights, on the border with
Syria, and Jerusalem may be
internationalized. But there is
surprising agreement between
these Arab proposals and those
finding wide acceptance in Israel. Many Israelis are quite.
willing to return, with the exception of the woman Heights,
the land captured in June. The
point is, though, that, contrary
to popular belief. both sides
want to associate.
The important question—the
one which units together Arab
and Israeli mechanisms—is the
question at the future.
There are various connections
licking around a m o n g the
brass, ranging from minimal
relations to a Middle East Federation with Israel as an autonomous Jewish member. But
for some reason, no one has
mentioned the stainless and
most effective plan: one which
not only events the Great now.
era but also capitalizes on the
common aims of Israelis and
brass. This is a societies disease federation.
There is a clear basis, in the
kibbulzim, for a joint ArabIsraeli experiment ill disease
mechanism. It will be the greatest front oi all it Israelis help
make the Arab revolution.
 
find-y. Febr ry IO, I758
SPEAKERS REPLACED
DRUG EXPERTS DROP OUT
Only two or the four original
scheduled conflicts for Grin<
neil‘s Drug Symposium will be
coming.
Dr. Paul E. coding, config
fred by some to be the major
attraction, may soon be the
only attraction.
Two of the original conflicts
— Daniel Freedman and John
minister —- have cancelled their
visits, and a third — Joel Fort
._ has showtimes his stay to
just a lecture presentation on
Thursday.
IiIIIiillIIiiiiIIIiiiiIIIIiiiIIIIiiiiIliiiiiilliiiiillilililiiiiiilliiiiilliiiiiliiiill
personals
(Editor’s Note: Personal
advertisements s h n u 1 d be
placed in the 5&3 mailing
or sent to holly Wolf at least
ﬁve days prior to the desired
publication date. Ad rate is
three cents per word, including articles and corporations.
Cash should be included with
your ad copy.)
erLlNo TO norm) is Golden
retrieved next year? it you are a
student or run-lily member contact
Mike Bornstein. extension 455.
LOST ercr DECEMBER n pair
or heavy browntrarned glasses. full
Steve Anderson, extension 359.
White OTHER THAN A MUGrnnt or smaller] studio portrait? Or
a selected, mounted enlargement
from n large, varied his oi need.
times? Reasonable charges. For inInn-nation eric nerneir TePaske, extension 579.
Fun SALE. denmark portable
rewme machine, Six years old, good
condition, zipperioor. riittonhoier,
eleven more nruehmcuts. Call Holly
riohileh. frames.
LOOKING role SOME Acrlom
Advertise in the sun. We take anything, and it we Can’t sell It roiyou we may buy it ourselves and
charge it to the school.
FOR SALE —— YOUR choice. an.
used oitrcampus underground news-
paper or one united radio nation.
Conuct onnneii College.
nirvana’s
Pizza
Ahrv Says
“Happy
Valentine’s Day”
Tom and serve
harrison
Free Delivery
236-6222
Various reasons for the conversations were given by Heather quote who headed the planning committee.
Joel Fort, University or calls
bosnia sociology lectures, must
leave early to teach a class at
Berkeley Saturday morning.
Due to the limited transporta<
tion out of Des points, he was
forced to cancel his Friday aftemoon panel, and Friday evening discussion, Heather said.
John vibrator had “business
in Washington," and Daniel
Freedman, oi the University oi
Chicago, who had been speed<
used since November, “decided
he coupon’t make it."
Replacing vibrator, who is
Director or the Federal Bureau
of Drug Abuse Control, will be
his assistant,.Frederick cal“
field.
Lauren Woods, chairman of
the university oi Iowa’s pharmacology department, will re
place the long scheduled Freedman.
SCARLET AND ILACK
IlcOIIRTHY SUPPORT BEGINS HERE
Grinnell support for McCarthy
for President is actively underway. Last w e e it end three
"prominent” faculty members
(Joseph Wall, C. admin Gilmour and Edward Moore) met
with Curtis fans, National
Democrats for McCarthy coordinator for the states not having primarily.
fans assured the Iowa group
or a personal visit by McCarthy
this spring either before the
county or the state presidential
conventions.
The iowa Democrats for McCarthy have hired a full-time
secretary and are opening an
office in downtown Des tunnel
next week. They are attempting
to secure commitments from
prominent iowa Democrats to
serve on the McCarthy stats
steering committee.
G r i n n e l l supporters have
pleased $200 to be raised before February 15, the date of
the organizational meeting for
Poweshiek C 0 ll 11 t y. Edward
Moore has personally requested
financial support from the Col.
legs community.
interested persons have been
encouraged to write and/or send
money to Box 103, West Des
points.
llllmllltiilllltillllliilllliiilllliiillliiiilliiiillliiillliiilllliiiilliiiiilliiiiIlillilllilliillliliilliiiillliiillliiiillliiilllliiilliiiilllliiillliiillllliilllimllliillllii
g: POLL —
(Continued from Page 4)
present norm-south system result in an informal living situation—found 64 thinking not,
andlortydive improving.
One rather articulate male
ireshman noted the obVious disadvantages to the new hall
system as he saw them.
First, he said, the new system
would “seriously damage the
1M program (one oi the new
participated sports left)?’
Second, "long-range investments (TVs, ping long parties,
etc.) would become non-exit<
tent due to the cost of one
year's equipment."
And third. “the cost of
changing forms lrol'n men's to
women's, and DI the new reception (control) center—when
our Treasurer says were almost bankrupt,” are obvious
drawbacks. he concluded.
- Pm Eleven
ﬁr DIXIE
(Continued from Page I)
throw it into the House or Rep<
reservations.”
“The Republicans are trying
to capture enough states so we
can choose the President or the
United States. For that," he
added, “we’re trying to do you
all a favor."
"Most ol the Democrats in the
State," Edwards later remained,
“are a bunch oi constitutes (‘it
you ladies will excuse me‘), doing what George (Wallace) tells
them to do."
“This tracks of Huey longest in a way, in the power that
this man hall"
“What we're trying to do in
the South," he elaborated, is
approach (harrison politics) with
a real that approaches idealism.”
“Only in the recent past have
we made any in-roads (in the
South)."
seventh per cent at the veteran the Deep South are independence, Edwards said, and this
is good because “everyone used
to be Democrats because that
was the only thing they would
be.”
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Friday and Saturday II «.m. - Midniie
CAR SERVICE - iiiSIDE SERVICE - CARRY OUT SERVICE
HELLO GRINNELL COLLEGE
YOU‘RE INVITED TO VISIT
We would be proud to have you as our
HELEQ
GRINNELL
COLLEGE
WELCOME STUDENTS
TO THE
HOME GE FRIENDLY DINING
Open - Sunday thru Thursday IT cum. - IO p.m.
OUR HOME FOR
FRIENDLY DINING
Present this Coupon for one
cup of shipped Hot Chocolate FREE
Customer
Limit One Per Person _ Coupon Expires lab. lb. ms
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page Twelve
@WMWMWWWVWVWVM
» much wwmmmwwmmmmm «g
él ~‘ i‘ t‘ ‘i it:3
Q .
i‘Jfé’gﬂJ with; l
QRWWM .i'
VARSITY, FROSH SPLASH
The plymouth swim team
let two new Grinnell pool re.
cards in hanging the Pioneers
I 54411 defeat Feb. 28. The
meet. held in the Grinnell pool,
left plymouth at the top of the
conference timing for the championship.
The scott' new records were
set in the «ion yard wesley
13:56.3) and the 400 lifestyle
relay (3:283). The old marks
for these events were both set
by iowa State in 1961, with times
of 3:565 and 3230.9 respectively.
The only double winner for the
Pioneers was Bruce picks, who
won both the so yard (29.5) and
too yard (53.9) lifestyle races.
Grinnell’s only other first was
taken by John gilbert in the
200 yard breast stroke (2230.6).
Second place ﬁsisters for the
charles and Black were:
explain —- 200 and 500 yard
lifestyle
Williams — 200 yd. backstroke
and 160 yd. wesley
perfect -— so yd. lifestyle
Wells — 200 yd. butterfly
Frohlioh —- Diving
Third places for the Grinnell
team were taken by:
Seiiert — 1m) yd. lifestyle
martin — 200 yd lifestyle
western — 200 yd. backstroke
cause — 200 yd. breaststroke
Schaaiman — mo yd. butterfly
l**‘k
The Grinnell freshmen swimming team polished to tour
new record: during an interested meet against the variety.
A 4:05.23 time by Dan Meyer,
Tom Gibbons, Bruce collins
and Craig Gordon set new pool,
school and Midwest Conference
freshman records in the 400
wesley relay. The old
records were set in 1967 by the
Grinnell foursome oi german,
gilbert, Williams and anderson.
Dan Meyer also broke the
existing Conference Freshman
Record and set a new all school
mark in the 200 yard breaststroke with a 2:210 time. gilbert was the former holder of
the records, set in 1967.
Bruce collins added new records for both variety and cross
with his 100 yard lifestyle time
Of 51.7 seconds.
The final. record set during
the meet was a new school
freshman mark for the 400 yard
lifestyle relay. collins. Meyer,
Gordon and Dave Brown powered the new record to 3:37.54
llllllllllllllllHtllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllilllllllllllllllllllllllll
BASKETBALL
Grinnell saw its basketball
record drop to 1-11 over the
weekend as the Pioneers lost
two away games. in losing to
Cornell and the University of
Chicago, the team was outscored 1567119.
Grinnell—Cornell
Grinnell lost a 75-63 decision
to Cornell Friday night. The
maritime score was tied at 30‘
EU, but the cams cumshot the
Pioneers 46-30 in the second
half to win the game.
Mike Schwartz was the only
man on the Grinnell squad to
hit the basket consistently,
scoring 13 in each half. Thor
johnson, log Able and Don
Peterson added eight apiece to
the Pioneer score.
Grinnell-Chicago
Saturday night, Grinnell ran
up against the nation's third
best defensive unit and dropped
an 80-56 decision. Chicago
nominated the game, leading
55728 at maritime.
MMWMQQMQWMM
By WILLIAM ALAN GRAY
@i’tNﬂ ﬂiAEitTHEIK
The first two weeks of basketball have now been completed
and everybody has left into the race with all the server and excitement that one has come to expect from LM. basketball. Cowles,
after selecting with Gates. lost two games to watson. watson,
now tied with Smith for first place in the Treusdale race, is building with enthusiasm. They met wto a large setback, however. when
the LM. board refused to function Dance I. M.’s as a legitimate
North Campus sport. Langan suffered an even greater loss when
Dave kathy was lost for the season while performing for the
Golden words against the ti-eshman team. Langan promptly went
out and dropped two to liable. East pulled the big upset or the
year, so far, when they beat the Smith “A” team. The Gates ”A"
team (which was started) gave up only nine points to North in
the first half and was still behind. This pretty much typifies the
year Gates is going to have (Wait ’til middle tennis). Nothing has
been decided, though, so I'm sure my progress reports will be
awarded with pages notification (yawnrgaper
Rich Wickstrom has nominated the college bowling league for
the last two weeks by operating 200 for the last six games. who
team contained by yours truly (subtle plug) has leader into first
place, however, with a N mark. High point of last week's selling was Mary Kay Earl trying to get a quarter out of a pocket in
her stretch pants. The old bowling league just air‘t what it used
to be (chucklechuckle).
SCARLET AND BLACK
Saturday. February lo, I?“
 
SCHAFFER'S ICEMEN COMETH
By JEFF SCHECKTER
Goals by Graham, Crandall,
and Jackson gave the Grinnell
Blades a 3-1 victory over Des
points at the Des points ice
Arena Sunday.
Grinnell nominated play in a
game of excessive southwest.
Des points was rendered by
eight penalties, shipping, laughing, crosschecking, and building, which meant that they had
to play short a man for a total
oi 16 minutes.
Although a few Blades were
anticipated to fight by an allow
in the mouth and by a stick
across the back of the head,
it o t h i n g developed, enabling
Grinnell to avoid penalties, and
to play the entire game at full
strength.
Grinnell’s ﬁrss line of Graham, .l action, and Millikin
scored in the first 44 seconds
of the contest. Grinnell controlled the face-off, shooting the
pack into the offensive zone.
Jackson due the pack out of
the right corner and fed a wellplaced pass to Graham sea<
signed in front of the Des points
net. Graham then beat the goalie
on a quick eight foot shot to
give Grinnell a lo lead.
The second line of Crandall,
Schaffer and Allen upper the
score 270 two minutes later.
Detenseman Joe La notes
passed to his partner on the
blue line. Steve Gausebeck, who
fired a 60 foot shot. Crandall,
positioned in front of the net,
t o o k Gausebeck's s h u t and
shipped the pack past the Des
points goalie not‘ the 2—D advantage.
The first period ended 2-1 after Des points scored from a
distance of 25 feet on a screened
shot.
Half way into the second
period, Grinnell earned its third
goal. Bruce Graham fisher the
pack out learn behind the Des
points net and passed to Tom
Jackson, standing just outside
the create. Jackson forced the
pack off the Des points goal<
ie's state into the net.
A combination of good defense,
backchecking. and goal sending
shut out Des points during the
second and third periods.
Grinnell out-shot Des points
2442 and goalie nl l-leimaiin
For School or
Typewriter
Supplies
Grinnell
_ Office Supply
GRINHELL IOWA
actor hon who PM! Oﬂlu
turned away 11 attempts, com
Sitlerably less than his effort
against Carleton, which saw
hint kick out 47 shots.
Saturday night, February to,
is the ﬁrss annual Iowa Collegiate Hockey Tournament.
Three games will be played at
the Des points lee Arena (72nd
and Hickman Rd.)
The semifinals pit the Grinnell Blades against Western illinois University at 6:00 pm. and
cleveland against Iowa State
University at 7:30 pm.
The Winner of the two semifinal games will face-off at
9:00 pm. for the championship.
One ticket hosting 31.00 will
m good for all three games;
they can be purchased at the
Des points Ice Arena on the
night of the Tournament.
Free transportation will leave
from Cowles parking lot at
4:00 pm, Saturday.
momoooamammmmm
A position ii in
ZiiiiZWhlih
ii the player to move
must make a move that
will bring on his detect.
CJEQCJEDCJE‘D
By J. VON ERIESEN RAZ
The chess master combines a unique set of parents, personality
trails, and abstract abilities, which he sessions into a highly differentiated system of thinking and playing methods.
initially, he is dealing in a subject matter composed of score
magic spatial (two- dimensional) possibilities for movement.
To the chess board he brings two facilities which are relatively
discrimination: a high non-verbal intelligence and a powerful
memory capacity. The high universal intelligence is furthermore
manchester in two forms: a spatial memory and a construction
spatial imagination. The distinction made here is that the complex
abstract images with which the player works can hardly be considered either textile or visual. By anatomy, the chess master is to
visual images as the speed reader is to programming each word.
The powerful memory capacity can probably be better understood when it is seen that it enables the master to learn program<
simply by experience, to refine his operating rules constantly by
means of the mental operations of instruction and rehabilitation
It a high rate.
The above congratulations are commonly understood by those
who have had relatively little or no experience with the game.
There is, however, another facility processed by the chess master
which is often overlooked and warranty our attention.
The pendant oi generating hypothesis is testing them. For ex.
apple, over the board the choice of a good move tests largely on
forestry possibilties for action and on the evaluation of forestry
results. The thought process is essentially an empirical investigation — there is no a priori or detective way to establish with her<
twenty how much can be obtained or how much can be proved (at
this point the problem of chess is strikingly different from that of a
mathematics problem). It is an investigation which terminates in a
decision necessarily based upon incomplete evidence, and necessarily directed towards quantities results.
 
NSA-Sponsored
GROUP TO EUROPE
Leave line 5—return August 21
LONDON or BRUSSELS
Sobenu Airlines Scheduled Jet Service
For Details:
GRINNELL TRAVEL GENTER
Grinnell, Iowa
 
written Inner-ill in the charles A Block cannon be produced m .
. public-no. purpose. without tn. wrote consent or the color.
 
